Well, reflecting upon all of this has made me realize that I need to come up with ways for my sons to be able to have a better tool kit for conflict resolution. I want them to grow in their relationship instead of letting their relationship with each other fizzle. Dear Hubby and I always hope and pray that they will remain close for their entire lives.
Make sure the shoe matches your foot type and running style. Having a shoe that suits your foot type is the best prevention for injury and pain.
The last corner, before the straight road home,
Two cards for me because typical me, I went into crafty mode before I navigated my mind, made a card following the theme then remembered my friend Ruth the artist behind A Passion for Stamps is our sponsor this week, so I could hardly forget to make a card using one of her lovely images, especially as I am lucky enough to be on her design team !!
The image here is one of Pettibone’s Flowers of 1971. Gallerie Sho from Tokyo had on view three of these little beauties as well as two small Marilyns, 1978. Look at the dimensions, the Flowers are less than 2 inches square. Each painting is carefully screen printed, stretched on canvas and framed with wee nails and slates of wood. These miniscule works are reduced to sheer perfection. Oddly, seeing theses tiny Warhols touched me much more than seeing originals. Of course without the original, full-size pieces, Pettibone’s couldn’t exist. And yet seeing these Lilliputian paintings is breathtaking. They become objects, trinkets, toys.
That being said, I do want a few things for my family and myself in 2012. I just want us to spend more time together. More meaningful time might be the better way to say it. We are in the same room kind of together a lot. I hope we can experience some fun things in life together. The other thing I want is to spend more time outside and less time locked in the house. I received a copy of Let's Go Outside by Jennifer Ward for Christmas and cannot wait to put it to good use. On the same note I want to make things together; bake with my kids, do crafts that involve more than crayons and paper (no really), let them create. Lastly, I just want to spend time with friends and family; deepen the relationships we have. I'm sure there are a few other things floating around, but I do NOT want to make a list and this teetering on the line. I am excited that this year I will not be pregnant nor will I have a newborn. I have either been pregnant or nursing since August 2006. While I'm not done nursing, feeding an almost one year old is way different than a newborn. Except my almost one year old (I need to stop saying this, it can't be true) still nurses at least six times a day. Anyways, I don't know if we are done having kids forever, but we are for now.
American Life League
Ghostbusters II
One of the group’s long-term members is Tom, who has been with the group for almost four years. “I was in a bad way early in 2008. I had closed down and was struggling to cope with life and my physchiatrist sent me to The Charleston Centre in Paisley for an eight week Assertiveness Management Course. On the very last session Dr Jane Bentley came along as a treat with her bags of djembe drums and held a thirty minute workshop. Something just clicked and for the first time in ages I felt my troubles ebb away. The very next day I plucked up the courage to go to Buddy Beat’s regular weekly meeting, and I have been there ever since.”
Be respectful of and nice to your kids. Hold them close with your words and deeds; show them the love they need and deserve. Don't send them to the corner of your life, physically or emotionally.
My teenager called me crying from school the other day. Aside from the fact she hadn't slept well the night before, she was heartbroken, and for good reason. Once again her father (my ex) turned his back, and gave her the cold shoulder. I watch my daughter suffer and cry, and my heart goes out, but I also get angry. She is genuinely confused and hurt, and there's no amount of words that will fix it. In my head I'm getting in my car, driving 2 hours and kicking some ass. I'm looking for blood. Sigh. I guess I'll behave.
It’s a cycle.
11. Cathy - Claret Toi
Mae and Pap had a trailer, that in my "child's mind" seems forever away from our home... but when I look at the lot that held our home and their trailer today, I wonder how they both fit! Both their home, and Mamaw's were surrounded by flowers of all kinds: roses, tulips, daffodils and iris to name a few. To this day, an Iris remains my favorite flower... especially a purple bearded iris, there were tons of those in the flower beds. Mae and Mamaw spent a ton of time in those beds caring for them. I have such vivid memories of those beds!
(Myah, that last line just made me burst out laughing.)
These circumstances and the fact that I do not appear, at all, on either of my parents’ 호적 (ho-juk, family register) gave the immigration officer a bit of a headache. He didn’t really know what to do and said he’d never had that situation before. He also said, if I had applied for the F-4 in Korea I would have been denied. This, above all else, confuses the crap out of me. Forgetting all of the particulars of who was what when I was born… if it were the case that I am ineligible for an F-4, why did the NY Consulate issue it to me? Someone has their requirements all messed up… you’d think for something like this it would be consistent, or at least they would only allow one of the institutions to issue the visa to prevent such mishaps. I’m also slightly inclined to believe that everything is actually okay and the NYC consulate knows what its doing and that my situation wasn’t fully explained to the immigration agent, but that doesn’t have anything to do with consulates or immigration offices.
Lifespan: 4 months, sporadically
Tomorrow is my last day at my current job...BAHHH
One often disturbing aspect of the film is how often the racist ideology, spoken adamantly by Derek, Daniel, et al, is not always counterbalanced. In the very first scene, Derek offers an a strong speech about how much illegal immigrants are costing the state of California. Then he complains about immigrants taking jobs away from whites before leading an assault on a grovery store owned and operated by minorities. You can almost hear people agreeing with his sentiments before the brutalization of his violent act tears it all down. But that is a rare moment. In many other instances, racist demagoguery goes unanswered outside of the implausibly fast changing of Derek’s mind, which I do not feel is enough to carry the film.
Add to this that home educators have neither been informed or consulted about this and you know this doesn’t bode well for the future. Sneaky is as sneaky does. Beware the frog boiling...
LDV: What is the most challenging aspect?
effects in some neighborhoods—those that received more than a few relocated households—that suggest that crime would have been lower in those neighborhoods had there been no public housing transformation. I live across the street from some of the largest and oldest public housing in New York, a city which didn't follow other metropoli in razing its projects. It seems right now that the city is content to bulldoze and demolish the storefronts and services these residents rely upon, and build condos for people like me in their place.
Furthermore, the bill makes it clear that illegal immigrants will not have access to taxpayer benefits such as food stamps and health care through MO HealthNet. With the passage of this legislation, Missouri sent a clear message that illegal immigrants are not welcome in our state, and that they are certainly not welcome to receive public benefits at the cost of Missouri taxpayers.
Additionally, you'll find if you look deeply, the topics I'm researching. Most of them are just fine but what about the links and information I'm putting in my next book? I've worked hard for what is in my head, do I want you to be able to see everything there before it is published in my next book? Would it put me in breach of my publishing contract? I'm not totally sure (but then again, I'm not totally unsure either it is enough of a question to bother me, however.)
- from the movie a walk to remember
Everything stored there and played back. Laughs on rewind, broken hearts on tape and dreams placed on a personal polaroid?
inspiration and fabulous talent shared here, hope you all got some great gift and ornament ideas like we did!
It’s true, my friends. The sun rises once the nighttime shroud has had its moment. The mountain is only accessible by starting at the bottom. There is no apprehension of resurrection until we die, get planted in the dark, quiet ground, and wait a while.
The Old Brown Jug host LA trio Mini Mansions, featuring Michael Shuman from Queens Of The Stone Age. The last minute gig has been put into place as the boys have a night off from their massive UK tour supporting Foster The People. The jaunt which includes stops at Manchester Academy and three nights at Brixton Academy in London has completely sold out, but the band have chosen the Jug as the place to showcase their own one off set. Local support for the how will be in the form of Fetch The Witches. Doors open on 8pm, and admission is £3 on the door.
One of the things I really enjoyed about visiting Japanese Buddhist temples was offering incense in the large outdoor burners that were always available for that purpose. The burner in the following photos is located at the Todai-ji Temple in Nara near Kyoto. The wooden box in front holds the incense and donations.
“I’m delighted to be here to recognise all the hard work they do. Every one of them is a hero in my book.”
This cover is just so sweet and romantic! And especially knowing what this book is about, I mean it's just like, bring on the water-works! I love the picture of Penna and David together, they just look so sweet and innocent, and the pinky-peach sunset glow behind them makes the entire scene look very ideal and romantic. It's like a moment captured in time that you can always look back on. Definitely a fan of this cover!
- Only 576 days until Catching Fire is released in cinemas #THG
and to be his servants,
Three days of some pretty hardcore night time quilting (plus most of today thanks to my Mum looking after the smallest child) it's done. Quilted, bound and finished :o)
- Built in Brooklyn returns to LaunchPad on Saturday for their first Craft Fair of 2012, offering local goodies of all sorts from 12-6pm.
In MAS, there are lots of incompetent deadwoods taken in from the days of Idris Jala. There are lots of managers only managing 2 to 3 people. Some of these managers have attitude and no heart of human that none wants to be under them.
But. I did not find myself caring about Max, or the people in the village. I felt overwhelmed with all the character development of the individual members of the village and wondered if I would be required to learn this all over again in a second book. The main feeling I had was “get on with it”. It seemed slow, even for a cozy. I also wondered if Max would have been able to solve the case if it had not been for the last-minute witness turning up. The conclusion was not worthy of the writing.
IT WAS HER!
Fabric to Cover Headboard (I used a stretchy-canvas type fabric)
Trick.
for giving your opinions
The papers are from Maja Design, "Fika?". I still do love this line because of the beautiful colors! For the first time I used paperpiecing on the skirt of Ginger. And I must say, I do like it and think I will use this technique again in the future.
Leaders answer the questions – “Who loves/accepts me?” and “Who is in charge?” To have the first and not the latter leads to confusion and throws water on the flames burning in this newly tasked individual. The best time to stoke the flames of excitement is AT THE BEGINNING – letting the fire cool BEFORE parameters are put in place and feedback routine(s) are established does no good.
ETA: Lessons of the Montreal Massacre: Why women must fight to be what they want. A really good article from two years ago, on the 20th anniversary, which interviewed a few of the survivors.
We have to save our country’s future. It’s time for us to come out on the streets and that’s how we can end this trepidation!
In 2007, this writer won a prize in the short story section, and we travelled down, my husband and I, all the way from Sussex. At the prizegiving lunch I met writers who had come from the west coast of the USA to collect a £50 prize – such is the respect for this award, and an indication of how much it matters to those whose work is selected. 2011 was no different. Several writers had traveled great distances for their moment of glory – a walk amid warm applause up to the Bridport Arts Centre stage, to collect a cream envelope from this year’s judges... see above - said poet laureate and said lauded writer/performer.
It is possible that still to this day I would not have seen Ninotchka had it not been for its appearance on one of those lists of the best movies ever made or movies you have to see. I bought it as part of a Greta Garbo box set some time before that list crossed my path, a box set that seven years later still has several untouched DVDs. But I am lucky/glad the circumstances led me where they did because Ninotchka truly is one of the best pictures ever made.
I have nowhere to go though if I don’t find a job. Because I’m 3,000 miles from my nearest safety net, 2 months behind on bills, I am stuck.
Her firefighter friend, Josh, scooped her up and took her over to the engine for a quick look around the rig, and gave her an entire stack of Junior Firefighter sticker badges.
In Beauty for Ashes, the second in the Hickory Ridge series, my protagonist Carrie Daly has known plenty of grief and loss, but a newcomer to town sets her on a different path. One that reminds her of God’s grace, and of his promise to give beauty for ashes, the oil of joy for mourning and the garment of praise for the spirit of heaviness.
and cheerful dispositions....all Aussie.
Estimated Study Completion Date: December 2013
Roll up your sleeves because you're going to be busy! All Capricorns are suddenly seized by a desire to become as efficient, effective and productive in everything they do as much as possible. (Stay with this and work with it!) Since you're gung ho to get better organized, at least, give yourself the best tools and support material possible so you can do a great job. (You know what a perfectionist you are.) Get file folders, cleaning equipment, paint, shelving, or whatever you need. You might even get somebody to help you? By the same token, why not apply this zealous energy to improving your health? You are a long-lived sign. You might as well take care of yourself because you'll love yourself for this later. Muuuch later.
For most of these past 29 years I have records of what I budgeted, what I spent, the budget-vs.-actual numbers and anything I was able to save (and not). When I bought my home 20 yrs. and 1 month ago, I knew, going into the closing, almost to the penney, what my payment would be and how I was going to keep this homeownership thing afloat. I prove out my checkbook every month...to the penny...and I don't give up until it balances. I could never imagine being off by a few cents....oh, the humanity! Yes, some of my friends think I'm nuts.
Eating: I've had six pieces of raisin bread toast with cream cheese today. It's exam period, what can I say?
CIC observed that the appellant sought information which was, admittedly, the intellectual property of AIIMS. Section 8(1)(d) of the RTI Act was attracted only when disclosure of information harmed the competitive position of a third party and not of AIIMS itself. Even if AIIMS was treated as a third party, it was not a commercial organisation that competed with other organisations. Further, it was not proved that the experts who prepared the question papers were in a competitive business such that disclosure of these question papers along with their keys could harm their competitive position. In view of the same, the Respondents' contention that the information sought was exempt under Section 8(1)(d) of the RTI Act was rejected. Further, Section 57 of the Copyright Act, 1957 was held to be impertinent as the fact situation did not satisfy the requisite statutory
Wyoming
I couldn’t think of a better candidate for the Editor-in-Chief of the Niner Times. She loves that place more than anyone will understand. I have so much faith in her it’s unbelievable. I just hope she knows how good she is too. On top of her kick-ass abilities as an editor, she’s an amazing friend. We’ve stuck together this whole year, and I know this won’t be the end of all of our crazy times together.
Happy selling!
If you just want what's on the surface when there's nothing underneath?
A child can't and depends on you to keep track of all
So when I found these stamps from Pixie Dust Stamps I just had to have them, I've only bought a couple for now but will eventually have the lot no doubt.
Have you got much planned for Easter? :)
And without further ado, the new year begins with a SEAC (Special Education Advisory Committee) Meeting Tuesday evening and a Board Meeting Wednesday evening. You can find Board agendas and minutes on the HDSB website by following this link.
It was fun though the walking here and there is tiring.
My bedroom. I love working from home, but fear that becoming slovenly is inevitable. I'll check back with you after a few more weeks of this to let you know the degree of hagitude attained.
There are so many times that I try too hard to fit a role that is just not right for me, be it the athlete, the size zero, or the perfectionist. Yet, when it comes right down to it, the only thing truly worthwhile is love, whether it is the people I love or the activities that I love. And in giving love, I receive love. I can’t– and I won’t– bottle up my soul. Clearly, as my rambling may suggest, this song was a perfect match for me.
you walk through the muted background
By water and bull rushes
‘By this time I had little hope of anything changing but, two days later, as I lay in the bath before my 38 week hospital appointment, my stomach heaved with astonishing vigour as the baby conducted what was evidently a major manœuvre. I didn’t dare to believe that it had turned a full somersault but, to my delight and the total amazement of the consultant and all in attendance, an ultrasound scan later that morning revealed the baby settled in the normal position for birth.’
But what about students who literally cannot afford not to work? I know this is controversial, especially as I’m not in that position, but I really think if you are dedicated and dare I say, desperate enough, you will make it possible. In the summer I hope to get a full time internship, but I’ll still be working weekends, so I’ll be commuting to London 7 days a week. Yes, ridiculously exhausting, and over £200 in travel, but I want it that bad. I’ve also been saving from working so that if I do have to work unpaid I can support myself. I think that the majority of people who say they can’t afford it either haven’t planned in advance for the possibility of working unpaid, or they’re looking for an excuse. I know this isn’t always the case, and I do think that internships should not be allowed to be unpaid over 1 month, as it would be pretty much impossibly for anyone to support themselves for 3 months to a year unpaid, let alone a student. This is why I think we shouldn’t campaign against ALL unpaid internships, but only long term (over 1 month), expenses only internships. They favour those from affluent backgrounds, and create even more elitism than is already present in the fashion industry.
My mother was a nurse. She was trained at the Edinburgh Royal Infirmary in the 1930s, something she was immensely proud of, and ran a clinic in Nigeria for a spell before the outbreak of the Second World War. Both her training and her hands-on practice predated the general introduction of penicillin into the germbuster arsenal of local GPs. Although Alexander Fleming discovered the use of penicillin in killing bacteria back in 1928, it wasn't until the end of the War that it came into general use, heralding a post-1945 period described as 'the era of antibiotics.'
The merits of hotness over pretty is easy enough to understand, they made an entire musical about it. Who can forget how pretty Olivia Newton John was at the beginning of Grease. Beautiful and innocent. But her desire to be desired leads her to throw away all that is valuable in herself in the vain hopes of getting the attention of a boy. In the process, she destroys her innocence and thus destroys the pretty. What we are left with is hotness.
08. Brain Damage 3:39
November 11 is my due date...4 days after Kylee's birthday. I don't like having birthdays or anniversarys close together. Now I will have to be planning 2 birthday parties very near each other and right after Halloween too. Me. The person who abhors planning (loooove parties, haaaate planning).
I keep reminding my son that he's as sick as the secrets he keeps. Had he admitted the truth a week ago, he would not have stressed himself out by trying to hide what I already suspected.
6. Special children are only given by God to special parents.
“Damnit,” I heard her whisper. “Damnitdamnitdamnitdamnitdamnit. I can’t deal with this. Not right now.”
And that is why an understanding friend is so important in times of trouble.
After spending an hour or more in The Mercantile, I stepped back outside, and took around Pendleton Square. Up the hill from where I parked, there’s an older building of which I’ve always loved the style, but it rarely has anything in it, store-wise, so I’ve never been inside. It’s now advertising for a salon, and I’m not sure what else. I think it’s because of it’s out-of-the-way position, off the Square, that anything that moves in there doesn’t get much attention.
You couldn’t pay me to live on that island. You could guarantee me an agent and a publisher tomorrow and I still don't know if I'd go live there.
Spares the next swath and all its twined flowers:
Wallala leialala
We should remember that the Father of Jesus is the Elohim Hashem Yah, The Only One God and there is no other God of gods, only the ever existing Jehovah created. Jehovah was the “Yah” (“Ja”) or the “Yes ” (“Ja”), the Being; without Him no life was or is possible. Yahweh and His Spirit, His Thinking are one and the same not separate. The one placed by the Spirit in the womb of the virgin Mary is the “Yah shua” the Jeshua who was given this set apart spirit and was guided by “Yah”, the being of and from God. In all his ways Jesus took the guidance of God His Spirit in him up and was completely observant to Him. We also should try to listen to this Holy Spirit and follow His guidance.
Secrets & Lies 1996 Hollywood Movie Watch Online Full Movie
was a very special lady.
Roman Davidov, who is part-owner of Hot Bialeys & Bagels, which is about one block away from the towers, said that his store has lost roughly 20 to 30 percent of business since JetBlue moved away from Forest Hills.
Mr Malone said increasing the availability of lawful, online content in a more timely, affordable and reasonably priced manner, brought the focus back to customers and was the best method to protect content owners’ copyright.
Despite the fact that Pooh and Friends no longer grace his bedroom walls, I still purchase Winnie the Pooh "books and such" whenever I have the chance. For myself. I refuse to give up this part of me. I've been a fan since... my whole life.
I am blessed!! I never realized how rich my life is. At 54, I’m fairly healthy, I have many, many friends, two wonderful sons, family, and I am on the other side of the world. During these past few months, I have heard from so many people who are following my journey! Many friends and new followers are taking this voyage with me and so while there are days when I feel very alone, I know I can always log on to the Internet and find friends who are with me in spirit! For that, I am so thankful – I recognize now how my words touch others and how their words touch me!
Ultimately, though, I pick names because I like the way they sound--and because, in my mind, they fit the character. By that I don't mean that they fit the character profile, or the character's thematic role. I mean that in in my mind's eye, if I call the character by that name, they answer.
Secondly, getting the most out of this guide will require somewhat of an adventurous spirit. Some of the destinations are well and truly off the well-trodden tourist track. But then, that’s the whole point, isn’t it?
- Lots of eliminating foods:
009.029 YUSUFALI: Fight those who believe not in Allah nor the Last Day, nor hold that forbidden which hath been forbidden by Allah and His Messenger, nor acknowledge the religion of Truth, (even if they are) of the People of the Book, until they pay the Jizya with willing submission, and feel themselves subdued.
last year, i made a set on flickr for my favorite photos of 2009. i added 365 photos... one for each day, but not all necessarily taken each day of the year. that seems like a lot of photos, but compared to how many i took that year, it was not.
“It’s why Radiohead is still the greatest band in the world…because you just don’t know what they’re going to do next. You may not like every record, but you’re excited to see if they’re gonna have any weird, new discoveries.”
According to the Environmental Protection Agency, VOCs are 10 times more concentrated indoors than outdoors. In addition to personal care and cleaning products, they are released from paint, lacquers and glue. Steinemann found that one fourth of them were considered toxic or hazardous by federal law.
Our love/hate relationship with chicken finds expression in folktales, song and dance, and in the stereotypical images of American popular culture.
in lava and springboarding chemical outbursts.
but be concerned for this
rogaḥ pātakinām iva
2. To step off noisy Gaushala (the name means "Cow shelter") and enter the gates of Dwarika's heritage hotel is to truly experience another city within the city. Dwarika Das Shrestha devoted his life to collecting the intricate hand-carved wooden pieces being discarded by Kathmandu's modern property developers, not knowing what he'd ever do with them, but sensing their innate value. His hobby eventually became this hotel, which doubles as a museum for Newar art heritage. The complex manages to be enormous and intimate simultaneously, and each room feels individually appointed and hand-crafted.
He said: "It is a problem when you get someone in who can't speak English and we wait hours for an expensive interpreter to hear their side of the story.
Bread or cakes baked on this day will not go mouldy.
The FBI made public a wanted poster with photos of the bandit standing at a teller window in his unusual outfit.
- 1 cup shelled edamame, fresh or frozen, cooked and cooled (255 cal)
Now come to Jupiter and prepare for a shock. Inhabitants who can conceivably live there are really something to see. The conditions on this planet are such that Jupiter man would have to be short, squat, with tremendous muscular developments and no eyes in his head! Yet despite this, he would be able to see in his own way.
And now, today:
So I’ve been meaning to do this for so long, but I was waiting for inspiration to hit me. I kept picking out paint samples and swatches, but nothing felt right. I just didn’t know where I wanted to go with it.
Cut up the sausage or ham and add that to the simmering vegetables. Stir in the roux and mix it well through the pot. Let it simmer for a few minutes with the cover on.
Writers : Natalie Babbitt
Overall, I am very happy with this moisturizer. I have started using a light night cream with it before bed to deal with my extra dry spots and wish that this had SPF, but for the price of about $15 this is a great alternative to higher end brands and I can see it being something I stick with for a while.
When searching for a lightweight jacket this morning; I realized the one from yesterday would match today's outfit. Rainy messy dark dreary day. Bright orange and green!
Basically, it’s a collection of people’s old journal entries and poetry. Usually from when they were teenagers. And we all know that teenage journal entries are pretty cringe-worthy to look back on — especially if they involve a teenage romance (or infatuation).
Within the cosmos the chaos is not a separation of consciousness
From the 1927 Kinderheim Kookbook, here’s Mrs. W. G. Bohnsack’s recipe for
I thought about copying and pasting the medical definitions and symptoms to try to give my reader an idea of what this all is and what it looks like, yada yada. But, I don’t think that would be an apt glimpse into my brain’s perception of the problem.
(a student of the greats)
White Labs WLP029 German Ale/Kolsch yeast
Black Memento ink and Copics were the
that only a couple of products are affected.
In each episode, the host will explore four homes looking for great design ideas and highlighting the value-added elements within each space. From interior design to the lifestyle and culture of the area, the homeowners will give viewers a first hand look of what it’s like to live overseas. This will be one of the most artistically shot programs on the network so don’t wait to be a part of this amazing opportunity!
But miffed students in these cities mocked the BN warning when they turned up wearing masks and scarfs bearing placards calling for electoral reforms and a corruption-free government back home.
What a week I’m hungry and I’m beat. Which brings me to this week’s short tale, Goldilocks and The Three Bears? I often wonder how Goldilocks felt that day she was out in the forest and was brave enough to stumble upon a home not having any idea who lived there. We do know the door was unlocked and there were a number of beds, when I think back to the story Goldy tried every bowl of porridge to see which one would suit her taste, after trying each chair to see which one was just the right for her to sit in. It’s take a level of courage and persistence to try new things not knowing what the outcome could be.
(Text Box comment Page 16)
Then on T.V. one evening. Art for All.
We have some farmers in our town and congregation who understand the practices necessary for fruitful produce. A few that I remember from school are that you need to rotate crops between fields, you need to leave fields unplanted every now and then, and you should not cram as many plants as you can in the space available. If you don’t rotate crops and leave fields unplanted you may seem more productive in the short term, but eventually you will drain the land of it’s natural fertility and make it unusable until it has time to rest and recover. In the same way, if you plant as many plants as you can fit in the space available it may seem like you will have more produce, but the plants will not grow well and the fruit they produce will be far from ideal. In other words, if you don’t follow responsible agricultural techniques, you will ruin both field and crop through unbridled usage and unsustainable practices.
My room became comfortably warm and breezy and i felt instant peace in my heart.
So here is a simple budget, which I have based on an average income for a mid thirties couple with two kids. The couple do not have degrees but are hard working and upwardly mobile:
Even more distracting is the parade of 80-something bare-naked bodies in the locker room. I bet I have a different view of the flesh I’m living in by the time I get to be nearly-dead too. I mean, then I’ll be anticipating leaving it soon enough and I’ll be proud of the fact I can get my clothes off and my swimsuit on eventually. There will be no hurry. I won’t care if ten forty-something chickens stand gawking while they try to cover their transfer from dressed to swim-ready. I’ll either be truly comfortable in my own skin or so detached from it I won’t even feel naked. If my mind is sharp enough, I’ll probably think of this blog post and laugh at myself.
“You know, Tiffany has always had an extraordinary history of product innovation, going back many, many years,” Kowalski said. “So I think part of the challenge of being an innovator is surprising people, and perhaps (being) upsetting to some.”
In 2009, SCYTL formally registered with the U.S. Election Assistance Commission (AEC) as the first Internet voting manufacturer in the U.S. under the EAC Voting System Testing and Certification Program.
& steel unreachable
Of Wippoorwills singing,
By now, anyone reading this blog should already know I have a penchant for the films of Joe D'Amato. Whether they be good, bad or downright obscure, I'm bound to find some perverse enjoyment in his work and perhaps dear reader, you do too.
Danny gave Oliver a wonderful blessing. Here are a couple of specific things that Danny remembers saying. That he will learn wisdom in his youth and that he will listen to his parents. That he will find a way to be a positive leader and example to those around him. He will bring a special spirit to the home and learn from his older siblings.
I finally went to the Dr. last night and he said that I have an underlying breathing problem and that when I get sick it decides to become a Full Force breathing problem. That explains alot, so now I have pills to help me sleep, and inhaler and antibiotics to fight the bronchitis. Thank you Jesus! I believe that we are somehow blessed everyday and last night I sure was blessed. By having a friend of mine admit me to ER, to having a chance to smooth some rough spots with DH, to having Dr. BlueEyes (dreamy!) take great care of me and being patient, and caring and also take charge, we are going to fix this!
What is Screnzy? The NaNo equivalent for script writers. We have 30 days to write 100 pages of script. Screenplays, stage plays, TV scripts, and comic book scripts. Any script. It’s time to write visual media.
“I have serious issues with this. Billions of people don’t have access to food. Hundreds of thousands in Toronto don’t have enough food and most of them are under 16,” Kearey-Moreland said.
I whill trade teu be poked and prodded...
Rather, the “benefits” of membership are mainly domestic: aligning national economic policies with the WTO regime sets up the basis for improved economic efficiency and attracts companies eager to invest in these countries, not because of their market size, but to export to the neighbouring region.
The Cursed Earth - the first Dredd mega epic. It's where I properly fell in love with the art of Mick McMahon after initially being a Bolland only man! I love, love the Last president of the United States vampire story and still rate that segment as my favourite 2000AD strip.
Studio: Production I.G.
That's the Craft Camp when you carefully plan and pack all your making stuff a couple of days in advance, only to find yourself half unpacking them the night before, because you're going to have to miss the first day and night to look after a sick child, so you may as well get on with some making in the meantime.
At thirteen someone loaned me a copy of “Christine” by Stephen King. From then on, and to this day, I read his work whenever I can.
- Philippines: It was well known the massive Japanese espionage activity in the country prior to the war. Japanese businesses were near every important bridge, electrical plant, and public utility, American military bases and communications stations. Japanese owners of huts near Camp Murphy in Manila had enough dynamite to blow up the city. A brewery had concealed a radio station that guided in Japanese warplanes. Even the Japanese consul and his staff informed Tokyo of warship movements, airport constructions, size of Philippine armed forces, number of American troops and aircraft.
Work is a blessing. Now before you cancel your subscription to the paper or use this page to wrap up dead fish, hear me out. Those who enjoy their jobs and don’t retire early actually live longer and have a better quality of life. Before you quit your existing job and look for something different, realize that sometimes it is just a different perspective or a change in attitude on your part that can make a world of difference in how you experience your current job. That being said however, vacation is a wonderful thing. I love my days off. I look forward to indulging my lazy side, sitting on the deck, lying in the hammock, fishing or just puttering around the house. Sometimes I have some difficulty fully expressing my lazy side but that isn’t because I don’t try.
Why? Partly for his education, partly because of his parents’ ambition, and also perhaps partly out of guilt.
Life takes time. (I know this seems pretty obvious)
1) a medieval chemical science and speculative philsophy aiming to achieve the transmutation of the base metals into gold, the discovery of a universal cure for disease, and the discovery of a means of indefinitely prolonging life
8. Schedule every day of your week every Sunday morning. A plan relieves you of the torment of choice (said novelist Saul Bellow). It restores focus and provides energy.
She told me this morning to “call it” – to guess whether it’s a boy or a girl. I had to admit that I’ve been picturing her with a boy, although I don’t know why that is. A few months ago I was thinking that a girl would be more fun to shop for, but after spending time in baby stores and on baby websites, I now feel confident that there are adorable gifts to be had for babies of either sex.
“Erbribble drr drr mrump blaaaaarh!”
Chloe x
- A Vauxhall custom print car with CT robots all over it (a personal highlight)
I ask myself if something's fundamentally changed...and I don't think anything has. Yes, life is busy, but not any busier than it used to be. The Sensual Goddess still fully supports my blogging. I'm still both a mystic and a sensual beast, and I'm still growing and making discoveries about myself. The journey continues, the views are always interesting, and the companions to share those views are delightful.
I hope these little girls are learning that what they've done is gross and sad. I hope they're beginning to understand that, as they brush their real hair and show off their skinny little bodies, they're only showing how incredibly ugly they are. And if they don't understand that now - I can only hope that they will one day soon.
Most of all, have fun!
David’s life became an introduction to the full sentence: “God didn’t send his Son into the world to condemn the world, but so that the world may be saved by him.”
“Full on the lips, Bananas!” he exclaimed. “Here is a picture of them doing it!”
Add all ingredients into a blender and blend until smooth. Yields 2 generous servings.
Ends
hasn’t yet
Variable-flow turbos aren't new, but Acura says its patented design, in which the TSX absorbs road irregularity in taut yet supple manner. Perhaps most pleasing to drive one during a whole week. However, the accessory acura mdx a package that includes a 6-disc in-dash CD changer, MP3/WMA compatibility and 8 speakers with 8-inch subwoofers. XM satellite radio is also good for this type of vehicle.
So as I said in my goodreads review, I'd give the book a 2 out of 5 stars, and the sex a 5! If your curious, read it. Honestly there are just too many good books out there to give too much time to this kind of fiction, in my opinion.
Sam: It's the most disgusting thing anyone has done to you SO FAR.
Their house, at 62 West Wallaby street has been converted into a bakery... Monster robotic kneading arms, flour dust, a windmill on the roof, a forklift with hands in oven-gloves... But danger stalks the streets.. bakers are disappearing... a cereal killer is on the loose... Wallace is too in love to notice, but trusty Gromit is the detective on the case..............
This idea may work for you if you have nice wooden legs to reveal, but if your sofa is like mine, it might be better just to leave well-enough alone, and work with what you have!
Result: 74
It made a nice change of pace from the Christmas theme too.
Aswan’s Savior: +4 All Stats, +1 Weapon/Magic ATT, +100 Weapon/Magic DEF, +60 Accuracy/Avoidability. You get it by clearing Normal mode of Hilla.
no time, no flesh, to waste.
"I'm attracted to deeply effeminate men" I reply
The authorities now quote a study by Introspek Asia that in a survey of 1,800 Malaysian adults, 55% believed our education system to be comparable to other countries, without saying which countries.
Fox News's Sean Hannity has since played the Today clip, accusing the network of intentionally increasing racial tension.
Like many gorgeous women, L is compelled to find an aspect of her looks to be hyper-critical about, and she has chosen one crooked canine to worry over; it’s a bit out of line, and it tends to make her smile slightly uneven, irreverent, cocky. But scrutinizing her smile in the mirror, she wailed, “Where were my parents? Where was my retainer?”
From Mark Kennedy's intelligence reports that were later disclosed to Ratcliffe defendants, we know he was recording things in minute detail, right down to people's biscuit preferences. The HMIC report's conclusion that he was going astray and that his superiors didn't know what this £5,000 a week asset was doing is just laughable.
Well Good News…Mobile Real Estate Technology is one of the “fast growing” technology fields….
Spinach braised with onions
"Ignore"
Now....where should I put "build chicken coop" on our to do list....before kitchen update....or after goat houses.
Fishing for Numbers - The kids use "fishing poles" to fish for numbers. For each catch, they record the number on a recording sheet and draw a picture to show that many. Later in the year, they will catch two fish and add the numbers together. Lakeshore has a cute Number Fishing Set.
A: And as far as the new and old covenants….. Sounds to me like the goat herders who originally wrote the book were all douche-bags, and some new group of people came along and thought, gee, this all seems a bit much. Maybe if we make this God character look like a good guy, we can convert more people without slaughtering entire towns and countries.
Release Early, Release Often, and Engage Users in a Co-Developing, Real-Time Testers
I’ll start the diet tomorrow. Or maybe on Monday. Never start a diet on the weekend. I should probably find that swim-shirt just in case.
What’ up Ghost fans?
Chop the tomatoes as finely or as coursely as you'd like your salsa to be using either a food processor or a knife and cutting board or any other chopping method you prefer.
Know your garden.
Yes, I have seen bad things happen....as you know very recently....but God has and will prove to be faithful to bring peace and healing to all of the hearts involved.
The next way to flirt is with your body language. There are three elements to this, smile, stance and stare. If you will notice, the young lady to my left is constantly doing these three things. But there is a good way and a bad way to do this. Yeah, okay. With smiling, it’s just you have like strong teeth and a good way to do it is like kind of a little smile. And then you gotta have a strong stance like you’re holding your ground. You’re not like swaying all over the place. And then stare, like we don’t totally mean stare, we mean eye contact like two to four seconds and then look away. Even if you don’t have confidence, you’ll fake it with those three things.
The developers aim to double their timeshare ownership in the next 10 years to have over 30,000 international members, which they say will be achieved by increasing their international exposure with a new marketing campaign to be rolled out in the new year.
I just received a text from Dorothy. Annika came through the procedure O.K.
Parents of children who don’t yet have the ability to communicate effectively with spoken language should be aware of the following important – and often surprising – facts:
-Let me be that I am and seek not to alter me.
Without even venturing into the subject of crime, it is quite clear that, in general black men are nowhere close to being Prince Charmings in their treatment of women, a fact supported by no less a figure than the US Democratic presidential candidate. Even without Obama's endorsement, white women must know the truth, particularly those who live in the inner cities, where the evidence is all around them.
President Obama came out of the closet, so to speak, on same-sex marriage. While I support him as President, I disagree with the president in this instance. Let me state further, that while I have voted in all presidential elections of late, there has not been one candidate for whom I have I voted that I have agreed with on all important theological issues, including President Obama. That being said, I believe President Obama has done an admirable job, all things considered. So, here are my two cents, for what its worth, on same-sex marriage:
If you're in the NYC area, I hope to see you there!
The date was fun with Don but, I've got to say, it was kind of nice having the first bit to myself, so my eyes were wide open to see everything possible around me. And the fried chicken and waffles tasted just as yummy as I sat and ate them alone on my stoop the next morning,
“Meetings have also been held with Ally McCoist and we had discussions regarding the potential impact of the administration process on the football department and we will continue to consult fully with him. It is clearly understood by all, including the players, that the football department costs will come under review as is the case with all departments within the business. No decisions regarding staffing in any department have been taken at this point and will not be taken until next week. “
The reason Osama bin Laden “sleeps with the fishes” is that there are scores of intelligence analysts whose sole job is to connect the dots from a mountain of information that flows into the CIA, the NSA, the Pentagon, the State Department, the FBI, and other government agencies charged with keeping us alive.
You'll note from the graphic on the side of the truck that the French equivalent of "911" is "18." Dialing "15" will summon SAMU, the more sophisticated medical response team. I'm told that SAMU and the pompiers are well coordinated however so it's always best to dial "18" first.
I have woven several silk items since my last post and I am waiting for a bright, dry day to take photos. As soon as I have managed this I'll be posting again.
he said in a smart-alecky way,
To me there is no doubting Amis's sincerity, but he does seem to have some confusions and he really needs to watch his language. I do agree with him that there's a mistaken and dangerous 'liberal' inability to condemn horrors perceived to be confined to other cultures, but perhaps the 60% of an audience who failed to put up their hands when he asked how many would call themselves 'morally superior' to suicide bombers were simply shocked by his diction? It's one thing to condemn an action, but it's another to bring the focus back onto oneself and bathe in moral righteousness. Much of Amis's diction is hierarchical in this way: we in the west are more 'evolved' than Islamic states, he says (it's no good Amis claiming as he has that by 'evolved' he simply means 'more civilized': the word has inescapable Darwinian connotations of progression and hierarchy); Muslims need (and want) 'to put their house in order', he says, calling on Biblical and western-political notions of division and patriarchal hierarchy (and in danger of conflating Islam and Islamism once again.)
These placid, adorable creatures with their copper eyes are veritable “purr boxes,” purring almost constantly when in the company of people they love. The one drawback of their affectionate nature is that they don’t cope well with being left alone for extended periods.
The rules for the award are:
StampsFloral Fillers, Loving Thoughts
“Moonlight”
Step three is to complete the recipe for each beer. For my current experiment, I found it useful to create each beer separately in Beersmith, manipulating the grain bill to get your target gravity, then working through the recipe as normal to get the correct hop dosage and such.
The phone went dead.
Obviously, I was angry at Paul for taking his sister out like that because although he didn’t understand how dangerous it was for them - Lise especially because of the cold but also them both, he could have walked them across the road when a car was coming. He had no sense of danger in traffic, y’see. Absolutely anything could have happened to them!
Listen to me, it really does! :)
5. Another issue, again nothing to do with my absence but just go with the stream of consciousness right now please, is my oven. More specifically the timer on the oven. When we moved here a year ago and did a little kitchen remodel on our new house, we got a new oven. Maytag. They are generally known for quality products yes? Well the stupid timer on said Maytag beeps 3 times in a row when it is done...and that is all. Done, will not beep again ever. Is it just me or is that wrong? Granted continuous beeping is somewhat annoying, but how about beeps at intervals until turned off? I NEED more beeps in order to not burn dinner.
hot or cold. Can you think of a better way to describe
Anyway, here is another photo of Casa Loma that really caught my eye when I was reviewing my photos of our visit. To me there is a bit of a keystoning perspective problem in this photo as well, but I actually like the effect and left it as is. I love everything about this photo – the colours, the textures, the lines, the patterns, the perspective, and the details.
I'll have to say November was pretty uneventful for me. It went by pretty quickly and I'm reminded how easy it is to get into a routine (rut?) Its been school, work, home, study, sleep, and repeat :)
Your world
I have received so many requests from family, friends, and readers for our awesome Paris itinerary that I figured I should start off the week (of what I hope to be all about love and my love for this city) with the details of our trip. This was carefully crafted with the input many, and reviewed by someone who lives in the city... so you know it's the real deal! We were able to cover about 90% of the things on this list, and when I go back, I plan on doing all of them again!!! I hope this is something that you will be able to bookmark, just in case you find yourself stuck for 5 days in the most beautiful city on the planet!
by Terry Pratchett
Despite the raw material, Diterzi’s creation is no po-faced litany, but instead a vital body of music and lyrics that engage with the subject as though its ebb and flow was positive, uplifting even. She had been approached by Argentinean stage director Marcial Di Fonzo Bo with the idea of a show based around Luxemburg after he had seen her on stage. He’d been impressed with her full-on approach and, equally, she has engaged head on with his idea, creating ‘Rosa La Rouge’.
Whilst looking for an image for a friend, I stumbled across a pic of one of my favourite models, Tina.
Ah heck. Now I just realized I need to come up with next month's suggestion.
MS: You can’t plan your life when you’re in a band.
Fifthly, and lastly, we praise Him in regard to those sinners who have for a long time existed in sins, however great, and have protracted their wicked deeds.
Across the street from our campground is the site of Belden School where I attended 6th grade a long time ago. The school had sat empty for many years and was torn down two years ago.
I was looking forward to this run all week! The temp was supposed to go down to around 50 overnight and I knew the temp was going to be in the low sixties and low humidity in the AM. I didn't mind getting up early and walking the dogs first. They were ready to go too. I think they realized how gorgeous it was outside too. They were frisky and and happy as they bounded through their usual paces.
Wataniya Mobile’s chief executive officer, Bassam Hanoun, said that although the network had been built, it was “dead” until Blair’s “forceful intervention with Israeli ministers” to allow the use of radio frequencies, controlled by Israel. Qtel is another major client of J. P. Morgan, having brought Wataniya with a £1.3 billion loan from the bank.
Now for another surprise! I am also offering a coupon code for my Etsy shoppe! You can get 25% off your entire purchase now through Sunday just by entering the coupon code FALLHOP at checkout. How great is that?
Does my silence protect me from further harm?
I live alone , and sometimes I revel in being a slob.......
We also managed to finally start planting the new herb bed (you can see it in the above picture, but more to follow), mow the grass paths and weed the raised beds, then finally beaten by the rain took a trip over to Ayletts to pick up some annuals to plant around the gooseberry bushes which I hope to get planted today. Rain allowing of course.
Everybody smiles at you
Friday’s RW quote also came to mind:
The second choice (pick one OR the other, NOT BOTH): Find out what people in your neighborhood think about the candidates for the Republican presidential nomination (you will need to understand who’s still in the race and where each person has won primary elections or caucuses). You can also find out what they think about media coverage of those candidates.
David was an adulterer and murder.
"And congestion charge. But that doesn't have VAT."
relationship and needs to be rekindled.
Christian Recovery leaders—participants in the International Christian Recovery Coalition, (www.ChristianRecoveryCoalition.com)–will come from the United States and Canada to share their programs, plans, and efforts to enhance recovery from alcoholism and addiction by reliance on the power of God. They will meet and speak in workshop fashion at His Place Church in Westminster, California, Friday, May 18 and Saturday May 19. Members of the public who believe, or wish to learn how, these maladies can be cured by reliance on the Creator are invited to register and attend. The Conference will emphasize the way early A.A. pioneers were, in their Akron A.A. Christian Fellowship, cured of alcoholism with God’s help in the 1930’s. All participant leaders and speakers are recovered, Christian alcoholics or addicts—with long term sobriety–who utilize “Old School” early A.A. First Century Christianity principles and practices in their respective Christian recovery endeavors.
I really don’t know where to begin in my views about the ending. To be clear, I am very disappointed with how the game ends but I’m not so livid to sign petitions to change the ending or burn up the official Bioware forums with my expression of hate for the endings. It’s already been done by enough people. Everyone practically knows that a huge majority of fans who have dedicated their time into this beloved game series are clearly upset. I may not have dedicated five years of my life to this series as I have just played all three games back-to-back since January of this year, but I can still understand the outrage.
There was always a look that passed between them, not meant for children to see, a glance that contained, like a password to an arcane mystery religion, the whole ancient hidden meaning of love itself.
and times. Rather, build your life on the proven and tested Word of God that’ll
“Ave you ‘eard 50 Cent’s latest? It ain’t nowhere near as good as his last one.”
Done fell through
to help
You may know Adam from his new project on the new reality show "The Voice" with other singers, Cee Lo, Blake Shelton and Christina Aguilera. If you didn't catch the commercial for it that was quite creative during the Super Bowl (yay, New York Giants won!), then check it out below! I really love this show, it's quite interesting! The commercial is hilarious and in it appears Betty White!
protocol in the name of the president, as he’s there in the president’s stead.
You might be watching several advertisements on television about various types of watches and wondering that why so many people are crazy about them. Actually, many people prefer water resistant or water proof watches even if there are better looking designs in the market. If you are also looking to buy a watch that can handle water then it is better to know the difference before buying anything.
My day times are structured, breakfast, snack, lunch, snack, dinner time.
I’ve started to read Diet for a New America by John Robbins. If I weren’t already a vegan, I’d swear to avoid any and all animals products after reading the first chapter. Robbins outlines some of the ways in which different animals feel, think, bond, and have emotions (much like humans), and then points out some of the cruelty and inhumane torture that these animals suffer at the hands of humans. And then…he gets into the factory farming industry. I’m not sure I can stomach reading any further.
I adored the sopranos,never saw it when it was on tv at the time but bought the dvd box set and took six weeks to watch the lot ,I didn’t like the ending but made up my own mind what happened that suited me… Not what I know was meant to happen. Great series and sadly missed!
Sourdough Chocolate Chip Pancakes
In the 1950s and 60s, my parents worked at the headquarters of the Post Office Savings Bank in Kew. It was a huge building that employed hundreds of civil servants in vast offices, lined with rows of desks.
The "layout" of the exhibit itself clues you in as to Cattelan's sensibility:
backstepping away from tomorrow
By: George R.R. Martin
Island Gingah Rootz Smoothie
SUI occurs when intra-abdominal pressure increases and the urethral sphincter opens inappropriately. During pregnancy, the fetus puts pressure on the bladder and the sphincter may relax and leak.
I love to make grilled ham and cheese sandwiches, with a french twist. Just take some high quality ham (I use black forest or honey), gruyere cheese, 2 slices of bread, and 1-2 tbsp of butter, and throw it on the skillet and toast both sides and then you have yourself a tasty treaty.
If I could walk around I swear I’ll leave
interesting choices. You can find beers from respected breweries like
As police officers we have a vast network of resources to draw upon when faced with the situation of cyber bullying. Besides contacting other officers and SRO's in our networks we have a vast on line resouce pool to dip into. I'll list a few of them here for your use, these can also be helpful when you are faced with making a presentation sheet or pamphlet for hand out to a class, group, or to concerned parents at meetings or if a parent approaches you with this subject either in your office or out in the firld. I make it a point now to carry a couple of copies in my " go bag", you never know when the need may arise and with today's attitudes in the department as to pro-active policing they are a great addition. As many of us on the job know not all Officers are created equal and some are " retired on the job" take the opportunity to give a couple of copies to our colleagues, a bit of motivation never hurts and who knows..maybe they'll get excited enough to get back into the ' swing of things' instead of just waiting to get vested for pension..!!
I wanted to tell somebody my story about the the keys and her ID. While ordering yet another Cuba Libre I managed to do this. This led to hanging out with this person and all his friends until around five am when the place started to empty out.
Rand, Erica. “After Sex?!” South Atlantic Quarterly. 106.3 (2007): 589 – 597. Duke University Press. Web. 1 Apr. 2012.
"I want all my friends to come up like weeds,
Floor Area Ratio as the basis for City Centre Planning
Though I wanted to cry, I didn't. This teacher had broken me of crying on the first day of school, when she threatened me - a child who had just walked in the door and had not previously been away from my mother longer than an hour - by saying she would send me to the principal's office if I didn't stop crying, and that I would be in Big Trouble. I had learned that school was a scary, unsafe and mean place, and I learned that crying was only an annoying weakness in my teacher's eyes. So I rarely cried in kindergarten, even though I frequently had reason to.
Eastbound and Down – “Me and Shane used to argue about Top Gun, and which one was Goose, which one was Tom Cruise… I guess we now know who is goose as Shane’s dead”. Kenny is still the greatest ars*hole of them all whilst simultaneously being the funniest. And I don’t even like Baseball. The boom box at the funeral was classic. Stevie was also brilliant especially watching the porn video “Whatever they do next, we do, ok?” – You have to see it for what that means – classic.
I want to run away from this difficult, terrible moment.
In the face of all these staggering needs, Corporations are sitting on TWO TRILLION dollars that they refuse to spend to stimulate the economy, even after America has reduced tax rates to levels not seen since President Eisenhower and a 700 Billion dollar bail out to Wall Street by American taxpayers. It is time to TAX the Corporations, put American workers back to work and fix America’s infrastructure.
Synopsis: This film is made up of various short films, each story is different, they are not interconnected by anything except for the fact that they are all dreams. Some dreams are beautiful, others are scary and horrifying, but all are amazing. All the dreams depicted in the film where written by Kurosawa, but some segments of the film where directed by Ishiro Honda, a director who is better known for having directed Gojira (1954) and many more films in the Godzilla franchise.
CONFIDING IN HIM.
This quote kills me. Reading through that issue of the Watchtower brought a few tears to my eyes. This man is saying, “Music.. drinking… drugs… hair…. beard… clothes….” When Jesus is whispering in his ear, “I’m here. Choose me, choose me, choose me. I created you. I love you. I want you to be mine. Will you trust me enough to let me be your God? Your King? Your owner? Your lover? Your best friend? Your confidante?”
Nitroglycerin is the classic treatment for angina. It quickly relieves pain and discomfort by opening the coronary arteries and allowing more blood to flow to the heart. Beta-blockers reduce the amount of oxygen required by the heart during stress.
6 hall
It was a very productive trip. We looked at most of the private estates, had a food tasting and a few cake tastings. Hopefully when they get home this weekend, they will have a much better idea on their location as well as their date. I am looking forward to their wedding this Fall!
A few views of the crib bedding. I DIY'd most of this after an exhaustive search for some cute, non-girly yellow & gray crib bedding. I made the bumpers with some white quilted fabric using this tutorial and these foam pads. The piping and ties I made using single fold bias tape in Canary. I blogged about the skirt here.
I’m self-aware enough to know I’m projecting a little here. And over generalizing, maybe just a smidge. A couple of weeks after my ex fiancé and I broke up, I recall someone asking me, “Do you think he’s changed?” In that moment, my “people don’t change” theory was born. So, I apologize if my tone is a little alienating – I’m working through some stuff here.
Say a prayer for me. Jess is out of town for work this week so that's adding to the headache right now.
While we are at it, congratulations to Boris Johnson on being chosen as the Conservative candidate. And congratulations to Ken Livingstone on being chosen as the Labour candidate.
Then came cookie time, the moment she saw my cookies, she asked "Mita...?" (what is ....) followed by "Ei..." " No...." all that was running in my mind was "Oh Ananda, you failed to impress a little girl, go jump into the lake". Beside my shortbread, there was yum strawberry fresh cream cake glowing, no wonder she hardly had a look at my shortbread. Even-though her mum tried to convince her she didn't bother much as she was licking clean her mum's cake. I wasn't sad but was smiling all the way and enjoying the cake aswell, but others were happy with my creations.
People may ask for your honest opinion, but if you are tempted to give an honest and objective assessment, do it with empathy and do it gently. After all, you don’t know what somebody else has been through and what they have had to overcome to create the art they are now presenting for your consideration. They are not fools. They put their best efforts, their heart, their soul and lots of love into creating their work. It may have special and deep personal significance to them. It might represent something very dear to them. This might be the very first time they have conquered their fear, put in the time and the effort to produce something that they are beginning to feel confident about. Their nascent confidence may be a fragile bud that has only just emerged. What they want is some affirmation for all that effort, mingled with a few tips and secrets to carry them forward on their artistic journey of discovery.
Another little peek for Mother’s Day ~ It really is just around the corner.
I started out teaching this unit by reading "Writing Dino-mite Poems" in the Learn to Write series. This is a great tool for teaching writing. There is a teaching book with printables and a read-aloud book for each type of writing. You don't have to purchase the whole set. Individual books are sold at my local parent teacher store.
Suffering refines the Church and each one of her members so as to strengthen their faith. Trials and tribulations will in fact produce steadfastness in our hearts as we endure to the end (James 1:2). God ordains suffering so as to refine our faith and teach us to truly trust in and rely on Him. We are proven to be true Christians by our steadfastness in our confidence in Christ and our boasting in our hope in Him through suffering (Hebrews 3:6). Do not be mistaken, suffering will most definitely come our way sometimes in very harsh and hurtful ways. However, evidence of those who are truly partaking of Christ’s salvation will endure to the end. Genuine believers will not become hardened to the truth and hope of the gospel during suffering, but instead persevere. God uses trials and suffering to display and identify[1] His true Church. Perseverance through suffering for the Christian will produce a confidence and assurance in their faith and hope in Christ for salvation. One can therefore self-identify if they are true believers or not. If during suffering they harden their hearts against God and turn from Him, they may not be true believers since true believers will persevere in faith and obedience even through suffering as they are empowered by Christ to do so.
Stamps: Just Believe
My first choice is always the music of Alex North. His magnificent score for Cleopatra – which was released in its entirety about a decade ago – will instantly put me into the writing mode. As the playwright Arthur Miller once said, “Alex North can break your heart in three notes.” What’s also interesting is the fact that North studied under Prokofiev when he went to the USSR in the thirties. At times he is jarringly dissonant, at other times lyrical. But he never becomes sentimental or gauche; his supreme intelligence always shines through. His music is everything I want to accomplish with my prose. I’ve written many a page to his wonderful music, and I heartily encourage you to listen to all his works. Perhaps you’ll be inspired, too.
I got a 12 x 12 sheet of metal flashing at Home Depot - covered the edge with strips of scrapbook paper to help "soften" them a bit. I designed the vinyl in MTC in three layers, one for each color. First I laid down the black layer with the title and icons. Next came the red layer and finally the white layer with the numbers which sets on top of the icons.
Pour me another
“Where I have since late 2010 – we should leave the eurozone and move to another arrangement. Had we done so earlier, the markets would not now be able to hound us as they do. It is utterly ridiculous that Germany is being treated as if she had a pressing debt problem, and it is all down to the Merkel Government’s indecision.”
WE APPEAL to the Jewish people throughout the Diaspora to rally round the Jews of Eretz-Israel in the tasks of immigration and upbuilding and to stand by them in the great struggle for the realization of the age-old dream - the redemption of Israel.
Wraps with lunch meats, cream cheese, lettuce and tomato using white corn tortillas
Together, with my brother and his friend, we went down the new Iloilo City flood way, and was surprised to see scenic views of ricefields and farm plantations blissfully transitioning into cityscapes as we rode under the pleasant morning sun.
He won a Grammy in 1980 for his album La Onda Va Bien, capping off a career that spanned over forty years.
The Boston Beer Company
tune in
70. Cryer's Cross Lisa McMann
I’ve gotten in a rut with making the same old stuff and if I don’t like the idea of the old stuff then we starve. Ok, not really. We end up spending money on some so-so take out. So I’ve been trying to find new dinner recipes.
I moved my camera to the right, out across the body of water.
The Current challenge over at The Inspiration Emporium is Watercolor ......Time to try out those distress markers or re inkers or anything you like to watercolor with! I decided to try watercoloring with my Distress Re Inkers and made a magnet for my Refrigerator.
Have I stumbled on a metaphor? But that's what's so good about this book. It's as gripping as any young person could wish for, whilst at the same time offering the very best in writing.
As soon as the pops are finished and out of the oven place a chocolate wafer on for the nose. The heat from the pops will melt the chocolate just enough so it will stick when it dries.
During one of our snowfalls here in Chicagoland we were discussing the slippery walk across the parking lot and shoveling snow. Susie offered this statement to the class, “Papa has a snow blower that eats snow off the road.”
Look at your heart and spine for controlled passion
We got separated in 4th grade due to each of our older sisters going into Jr. High School. The Jr. High was over crowded and going through an expansion so they instituted a year-round policy. The student population was divided into 4 "tracks" and rotated on a 12 week cycle. This meant that at any given time, 1/4 of the students were on a 3 week break. It would work out like this; go to school 9 weeks get 3 weeks off. Connie's older sister was put on Green Track and my older sister was put on Red Track and so we would go weeks without really seeing each other during the days.
In the aroma, the crystal malts of the Pale overshadow the roasted malts of the Porter, but only barley ... barely. The slightly piney hops in the pale do make a difference in breaking through the thick malt. It's a bit too sharp in the spiky malts.
And then I burst out through the gap in the trees and take in the Polaroid which develops before me.
a. John Holt
Documents show that the earliest black slaves in Cape Town were brought from Angola, not from the North and East of what is now South Africa; laws dating from the 1820s forbade residents of Port Elizabeth and surrounds from employing Xhosas. Of course, this was as much for the benefit of the colonists as for the locals, but nonetheless the early administrators were savvy enough to foresee problems with the 'natives'.
Chemistry
One of the problems facing the small business operator today, nudist or not, is knowing which way to turn with branding and marketing. Frankly, there is too much information available. What’s my solution? More information, of course! But here’s the difference: I’m going to share with you some insights into branding, marketing, business communications, graphics and Web design that have their foundation in something we know, love and share: nudism. You are reading the first in what will be a series of posts, and perhaps even an e-book, showing how you can “Use the Lessons of Nudism to Shamelessly Build Your Brand and Market Your Business (in an Age of Exposure and Transparency).”
From here on in the film essentially becomes a classic car chase flick as the hapless couples spend the rest of the movie trying desperately to get to the safety of Amarillo but at every step of their journey they are dogged by the satanic version of the Anthill Mob, unhelpful law enforcement officers, weird trailer park residents wearing so much polyester they certainly must be a fire hazard and sinister gas station attendants and librarians. I think it’s fair to say that the film only really finds its feet when the action sequences begin, shotguns are fired out of windows at high speed, cars are driven for miles on two wheels, stuff explodes, Satanists career off bridges and Peter Fonda consistently sports some the of finest 70s shirts mankind has ever witnessed.
And what wid every designer now having their own yarn line? WTF? Frankly, there is too much yarn out there as it is. Do we really need yet another line of yarn? I don't think so. That said, here's my new line of KC Idiot-proof yarn, specially milled for me by the local hardware store.
Why did they even bother to nominate animated films OTHER than Wall-E?
odie tollefson
Two weeks ago, I was in Target on a Sunday. Always a bad idea. People were everywhere, and I was close to loosing my mind. Even a short trip for a quick errand had turned epic. Barreling toward the exit, a child darted out in front of me. “Holy crap” was the first thing out of my mouth, then I realized I had not hit the girl. A mother chased after the child, grabbed her by the arm, and shouted at me “you should have hit her. Then she may have learned something” – then smacked the little girl.
Blogger fail, as I mixed up the order of my swatches, but as you can see in the photo above, both blushes are a similar shade. Azalea Blossom has a more matte, powdery finish, while Giggly has not only more pigmentation, but also a light shimmery finish one associates with mineralized products. Overall do you need both? Probably not.
Me: Oh, that will be so nice!
Muddy Waters - The Complete Plantation Recordings (1941-42), Martin Scorcese Presents The Blues (1941-64), and Muddy Waters At Newport (1960). Everyone's favorite cuddly bluesguy, Muddy Waters was one of the first to put Delta blues together with electric guitars, and thus epitomizes what most of America thinks about when they think about the blues. The Plantation Recordings includes his first recordings from the 40s and are acoustic, sounding much like Son House and Robert Johnson. The Scorcese collection leaps from one of these Plantation songs into the electric Chicago blues that made Waters his name. The Newport album is a barnburning live set. I don't know that I want or need any more Muddy Waters, though.
What does this sculpture bring to your sensibilities? Ugliness? Beauty? Disease? Healing?
My first little man turned the big 5 on the 14th. It seems like just yesterday we were celebrating Trey's 1st birthday when he was just toddling around and starting to grow teeth...now he's our little kindergartner learning to read & write.
Here is the real bumper though, for me, it seems. I heard the phrase “your birthparents loved you soooo much, that they . . . ,” and you can fill in the blank about placing me with parents who could provide well for me/give me what I needed. So, when I felt compelled (as never before) to seek out these birthparents who “loved me so much,” never in a million years did I expect to be rejected again. I thought they would be so happy that I found them, or that they had maybe been looking for me–that they would be as happy to know that I was alive as I was to find out from an initial report that they were alive.
Well, even though it was a failure, I wanted to upload and show it to you guys.
With Indian Festivals round the corner you can whip up some quick and easy sweets as offerings. It can be your usual prasadams or any sweets that you can offer on the festival day. Again the type of sweet can't be repeated, for example if you make a ladoo for a day, it can't be repeated again during the other six days.
I've also been waiting for the delivery of some net curtain wire to hang curtains for the playhouse outside (thank you Sue for your suggestion!) I wasn't able to find any net curtain wire in the US - so I got it from an e-bay shop in the UK. The curtains are made from 2 yards of cotton I got years ago but never used - I don't think I ever liked the pattern but I think it works well for the little house.
This is what has happened thus far:
Here’s how the article concludes …
This becomes an infinite loop. However, an external program might write ’0′ to the location of variable opt. Volatile variables are also useful when multi-threaded programs have global variables and any thread can modify these shared variables. Of course, we don’t want optimization on them.
As DWF reported earlier, while the cast were arriving on location, on set was Mark Williams (Arthur Weasley in Harry Potter). Maybe he was the "exciting" casting news that Matt Smith commented on a few days ago?
What are you guys up to?? I am going to go peek back out into bloggy land today and see what's happening. I stopped by Abigail's Alcove the other day and saw they got a house!!! Which is a wonderful blessing and so amazing. Now I have to read back through her archives to see how that happened. :)
To dog his heels and curtsy at his frowns,
Though the lodge arranges excursions, including trips out to swim with whale sharks, I chose to spend my time reading alone on the beach with nothing in sight but coconut trees and an endless expanse of aquamarine water. I was happy to be disturbed only when summoned for meals centered around the catch of the day — turmeric-scented, beer-battered squid one evening; hot green chiles atop fresh filets of a local snapper known as chugu the next.
“How are you, Sheldon?” she asked the man. I know that name! This was my half-brother.
It was much fun and there are other good ones that I have not got around to post processing yet. . .stay tuned.
Bur the O’Rourke team said the council should not “over-egg” the importance of Sherrin’s work and added there was no evidence the house had any link with the architect at all.
Last night Felecia and I rinsed out our growler and walked to Laurelwood in hopes of trying their Fresh Hopped Kolsch. I read recently, on a blog that now alludes me, that guys at Laurelwood drove south in the Willamette valley and picked up a truckload of fresh hops which they rushed back to the brewery to transform into beer that very same day. This little story is very exciting for me, and I longed to enjoy the exploits of their hops odyssey.
But wait, where is Apple? While Amazon and Google have managed to win a short sprint outpacing Apple by few months, both of their cloud music services have already been heavily criticized, both by the unhappy music industry and from consumers, who have found the quality of the services to be lacking. Such approach could send music content providers rushing into Apple’s arms. And if recent reports are to be believed, Apple has signed a cloud-music licensing deal with EMI Music, and is close to similar deals with UMG and Sony Music Entertainment.
Can't wait to get you in front of my lens!
- Laundering and packing clothes for David and M
During their first visit, Graham and Isaacs traveled up the coast, visited shelters and talked to thousands of people who were alone and scared. Many had questions about why this happened. They blamed themselves for having a home in the wrong location, being in the wrong place at the wrong time. Some wondered if they were being punished by God. They wondered what tomorrow would hold.
When selecting a real estate agent, take your time and ask lots of questions. Carefully consider the agent’s reputation and experience. This may be one of the most important business transactions you will make in your life. A widely trusted agent with great credentials can help your transaction go more smoothly and make the process less confusing for you.
Tutorial Blogger
Burke also quotes the ‘counterterror strategists’ who have argued that the ‘radicalisation of young Muslim men may be ebbing’. Well, who would trust these people, at least here in the UK? These ‘experts’ needed a few bombs in their own backyards before they even had an inkling of the Islamist and terrorist threat. For years the experts and counter-terrorists thought that British Islamists were either a bunch of clowns or that they were too interested in foreign battles to cause much damage here at home. It is strange, then, that Burke has so much faith in people who nearly always got it wrong in the past about radical Islam. It seems that Burke’s three years or so of stability has given the experts yet another reason for thinking that all is well at home. Perhaps the experts pay too much attention to Guardian journalists like Burke rather than wondering the streets of Bradford or the Islamic Societies of so many British universities.
While attendance at the church has declined since the scandal, the prominent megachurch had set itself on a new course of recovery with new senior pastor Brady Boyd and 10,000 members. And then this happened.
Maybe events more than 1500 kilometres north east will prove her right: maybe you never should give up hope.
"The only measure by which we will be judged by the people who come after is the health of the land base, because that is what is going to support them. They are not going to give a shit whether or not we were pacifists; they are not going to give a shit if we supported Israel or we didn't support Israel; whether we voted green or democrat or republican or not at all. What they are going to care about is whether they can drink the water, whether they can breathe the air, whether the land can support them. One of the important questions is to ask what does the land need from you." Derrick Jensen
No height without depth, without a burning core,
The Bible has much to say about our tongue and the words we speak.
At any rate, Peter Reinhart's book The Bread Baker’s Apprentice has a hefty share of free-form loaves, so I inevitably get some practice as I make my way through the book as part of the Bread Baker's Apprentice Challenge - an endeavor that I am still erratically pursuing, although I will be skipping the part of the challenge that deals with sourdough starters. It's a bit too much of a challenge for me right now! Anyway, enough digression.
According to Inv. B.W. Himan’s notes, Mangum described at least two of her attackers in ways didn’t remotely resemble any of the lacrosse players. No wonder, then, that she identified none of the suspects that police presented to her in photo line-ups on March 16 and March 21. On March 16, police presented four groups of six lacrosse players each. In each group was one suspect named Adam, Matt, or Brett (the police selected only 2 of the 3 Matts on the team as suspects) and five fillers (players not named Adam, Matt, or Brett). On March 21, police showed the accuser two more groups, with one suspect apiece (the other two residents of the house, Dave Evans and Dan Flannery) and five lacrosse players as fillers. In total, Mangum viewed 36 of the 46 white lacrosse players and identified no one as an attacker.
Of course the cinnamon roll is delicious and a showy presentation in itself, but for our family, the tradition of making it together means much more.
I have missed you all. What happened? Well. What happened is that for a long, long time, this blog was fueled by a narrative. A story. A bad and terrible story, yes, but people want to know how it ended. Now that it has ended, good heavens what is left for us all to say to each other.
In the Newhart Show, which ran from 1982 - 1990, this was the surprise ending.
every new season a beginning.
Where oh where do the years go? I am constantly amazed at how fast time flies. When I was
1.) NEVER TRY TO MAKE AND DECORATE TWO SHEET CAKES IN THE SAME DAY AND WHILE ON A TIME CRUNCH. This will cause major stress and a really bad mood for said decorator which will, in turn, put everyone else in a bad mood as she storms around the kitchen mumbling under her breath.
Prayers for Your Children (if you don’t have any children, you can pray for those children you know, mentor, etc.)
I was making the baskets one evening when Alaska Guy was here visiting..he asked “What in the world are you making?” I replied May Baskets he said “Gosh that was fun when we were little.” Adam and Noah were visiting over the weekend..Adam said “Whatcha making Grandma?” I said “May Baskets” He said “My Mom likes to make them too.” So next year God willing and the creek don’t rise we will celebrate May Day again! I hope you all had a wonderful May Day! :)
Happy Birthday Gabriel. =^..^=
According to Top Trumps, the back four of Liverpool’s reserve team has a surliness rating of 263 Murrays.
Hey, guess what? Blizzard pulled it off. The female panda’s are adorable. I knew the Asian themed areas would be stunning, that was never a concern, but they were even more stunning than I had hoped. I won’t go into much detail here for those who are trying to halfway avoid spoilers but I got instantly excited just seeing the changes to the character creation screens. Once I got my Pandaren looking all cute, I had to name her. I couldn’t use Elfi in my name since a Pandaren is not an Elf, but I did want it to be as recognizable as possible because I know there are a lot of people from my Google Reader and Twitter feeds on the Lost Isles server where I am. I finally came up with Jadeindale as a pretty good combination of an Asian themed name and something that’s a part of my normal naming convention. I know I won’t be spending a lot of time logged into the beta, but if you are there and ever run into Jadeindale feel free to give me a wave or a hug.
You see … Kelly wants to be a food writer. Professionally.
17. There's a Tear in My Beer -- Hank Williams Sr.
3. Take a photo of the card
And the first thing I will have you do, and I will do with you right now, forgive yourself. Forgive yourself with me. Forgive yourself for not being able to forgive. For judging those who perhaps consciously and inadvertently have harmed you, or have harmed the collective, or who have harmed Gaia, or who have harmed those you love. Let us forgive together today.
- 2 tbsp yoghurt
from below the chin to the top of the head is one-eighth of the height of a man
i didn't want to break up the white, so i added a white belt to give my top half some shape.
I seem to remember telling you that unless you had flowers not to return. I saw no flowers or candy in your mouth this morning when you stood on my front porch barking and asking if Lily and Sadie could come out to play. Something tells me you have not so nice intentions with my girls.. please do not come back we are not interested in your kind here. Sure, your cute and all but my girls can NOT come out and play. Sorry bud it may be a dog eat dog world, but we are all out of milkbones.
Over there...I see a fifty caliber machine gun, all set up and ready to go. I run for it, my six guns blazin'.
3- YOU CAN PULL OFF A LOT OF LOOKS THAT SKINNY LOVELIES JUST CANT:
First, to appease wary locals afraid to try new things, the menu always features Suntory's The Premium Malts and an Ebisu. Other staples are Ise Kadoya's four main brews: Shinto Beer, Brown Ale, Stout, and Pale Ale. Occasionally, as with last night, one spot is given to an Ise Kadoya seasonal. This month it has been their Imperial Wheat Ale, which is a bit too light and sweet for my taste.
I did a recording of my talk Against The Current, for the wonderful website The Unschooler Experiment, about a month ago. The Unschooler Experiment sets itself apart from pretty much all other unschooling sites in that it focuses on the stories and experiences of grown unschoolers themselves, instead of parents, and seeks to share information that's interesting and relevant to both grown unschoolers and parents of unschoolers (and grown unschooled parents of unschoolers, of course!).
If there is any wrong note in the movie, it is by Thornbury as Jody, Mike's older brother. Maybe because he plays it too jocularly, with too broad a smile, too feathered a mane of hair, too Californian an attitude. I realize why he does, but maybe this is a result of a movie telegraphing its punches too clearly. Or maybe not. This isn't insurmountable, under the circumstances; after all, Jody is a character to whom Mike looks up as his big brother, so any beatification of his actions would be understandable. But playing a character in a horror flick like one straight out of a McDonald's commercial may not have been the right choice. Then again, how many actors in McDonald's ads go around with women's panties in their mouths?
-I'm getting excited that Lampoons Christmas Vacation will be on TV soon. Now you know how my sense of humor rolls.
As you start to wind down for this school year and, if you are like me, you begin to think about next year, that means thinking of organization.
Turmeric powder -1/4 tsp
60 - 7.13 - Angela Williams, USC - '02
Oh! Let me tell you about the lemon water real quick. This is a tip that Leandro posted on the Team Beachbody website. He said that when we're not eating healthy our bodies can lean more toward an acidic pH level (because pretty much all unhealthy food is on the acidic side of the pH scale) and that can make it so the body holds on to fat. So he recommends that for the first four days on the plan we drink water with fresh squeezed lemon because lemon is surprisingly very alkaline. On day one we're supposed to squeeze one lemon into a glass of water, day two is two lemons, day three is three lemons, and day four is four whole lemons. Just the two lemons today was pretty freaking sour, so I'm thinking that tomorrow and the next day I will just squeeze one lemon into a glass of water and drink that many glasses.
Finally, I have a miscellaneous bag with multi-coloured yarns and different textures (and a little mouse peeking out!)
In conclusion, I think as those interested in ministry we should begin to ask God to lead us to our mentor. If you have already had a biblical mentoring experience maybe you are finding that God is calling you to find your own mentee. I have been thinking about my own mentor, wherever they are thinking about all the things that I will learn and be able to use to bless others, maybe they are even now longingly searching for someone to pass down their own knowledge and wisdom to, but I know in due time God will lead me to them.
The rebound- a quick fix remedy for a broken heart? After years of constant failed relationships, battered self-esteem and endless doubt the rebound has become a sort of thearpy for me, after every partner I cared about left I would go on an endless search to make myself feel better by finding other people who do actually want me. Well that’s what I would tell myself after one too many shots and the option to take the reasonable looking guy offering me endless amounts of attention home with me it’s safe to say I veered of the rails slightly. I thought those days of justifying behaving like a common whore were behind me, for the past few months I had been happily committed (in ironically an uncommited relationship) to one person, for weeks the fear of sleeping with anyone else scared the life out of me… And then everything I had become used to came crashing down around me.
That little blue sticker is my fave. It means it came from home.
Didn't I tell you that I get to go to the coolest places?
Today, however, I applaud the CAS decision as it is a good first step in bringing some order to the anti-doping movement.
I have been wanting to share a few of my favorite books for children, but have not found a way to incorporate this into my posts, so I thought, why not do a book sharing day.
The book was enjoyable and would satisfy any reader who, like me, loves Jane Austen and Zombies. I would highly recommend it!
Confessions of a Bad Beekeeper: What Not to Do When Keeping Bees (with Apologies to My Own) by Bill Turnbull
Mustard seeds- 1 tsp
If you should take into account
So this is one for those many different folks out there who enjoys a sweet milky chocolate with their tart.
Of course, the task isn’t easy. I get discouraged when I see meanness
I know, I know, I've been neglecting you. I've spent the last couple of months actually, y'know, being Frugal. It's the not having any money that does it. Most of the hobby I've done has been other people's, for money, although I did find the time for a quick Warmachine tournament and I do have a NEW PROJECT on the go too. Incidentally, if you happen to have some models that you want painted and can't be bothered with doing yourself, drop me a line here or via GAME OVER and we'll have a chat. I'm no Marike Reimer, admittedly (she's better looking), but I'm cheap, quick and tabletop quality.
While it is easy to criticize the online model, with its myriad dropouts and technical challenges, it promises to radically democratize a traditionally elitist and anti-democratic model. It even promises to educate its students better than the traditional university does. Whether you find this change exhilarating or frightening, there is no denying that something has to give. Student loan debts now exceeds even credit card and auto loan debt. The old model for higher education threatens our livelihoods and cannot continue unchanged. The future of our economy and our nation depends on radical transformation.
One of the most striking aspects about the coverage of the massacre was how the Zionist media were quick to ascribe it to terrorists, despite the alternative explanations available (revenge killing by a Thai worker, retribution for the killing of 2 Palestinian children near the settlement two years ago...). Not only that, but the whole Palestinian people were dehumanized in op-ed after op-ed, despite the Palestinian Authority's condemnation of the murders. In some cases the demonization reached cosmic levels. I was particularly shocked by a Hanoch Daum article at Ynet under the title These are not humans:
I know I know…get to the challenge right? LOL….Well, hopefully we have all pondered quitting our jobs, and doing what we love, from last week’s Take This Job… We are all hopefully balancing our ability to Say Yes to Saying No, and with any luck we have gone optimistically into Unleashing Our Inner Moxie. Now if we have been doing all of those things, finding our Unique Talent should be easy! I quite optimistically believed that by the end of this post, most of us wouldn’t need a challenge; we will have already figured it out! So what’s your unique talent? hmmmm?
*How far along?: 24 weeks 5 days when this photo was taken
Jordan makes the connection explicit as Erica, like Simone in the earlier film, is caught in the reflection of a car's rear-view mirror. Unlike other shots in which Erica is acknowledging her own psychological metamorphosis from liberal-minded media personality to skulking night-time avenger, this moment - as with the moment in Mona Lisa - provides the audience with enough room to consider the effect that this world with its cruelty, apathy and sense of moral decay has had on these characters; allowing us to question, personally and individually, whether the end really justifies the means.
#263 Ichario (Mariners) / #264 Sammy Sosa (Cubs)
Quick Oscar moment: thanks to all involved writers from start (2008) to finish (2012). And above all, lonely at the top: huge thanks to all hip hop enthusiasts, musical schizophrenics, fans, anonymous leechers, supporters and people who were active in the tight MS community. At day one I was under the assumption that I was one of the only people with "such a weird/eclectic taste in music". It's amazing to see that there's a (fairly big) worldwide niche full of lovers of 'jazz-hop' and analogue cross-overs.
And the ones who made this all possible, Mom and Dad.
I like that this poem brings up that common truth of wanting to be acknowledged, respected, and the typical human nature of trying to impress others even if there is nothing to impress with. It takes the human struggle and places it in the cab driver’s perspective yet anyone can relate to this poem, everyone knows someone who tries so hard to impress others and fails. The truth is in the details here, the holes in the shoes, the unshaven faces, the same cluster of people all going home to struggle on their own yet still wanting to outshine each other in some way, even a small way. I like this poem.
Laugh at Yourself
PS: I hinted at big things coming up on the podcast recently, and I'm now ready to release just a few:
I'm heading out to pick up camping supplies for the first trip of the year. We haven't had the camper out since September of last year, and everyone is excited at the prospect of a few days in the woods. It's always a nice, quiet retreat away from my self-imposed electronic attachment, and usually seems to signal my getting back into the studio and getting some quality work done. I hope it works this time, as well.
Personal Opinion
Painting the front doors black completely transformed my small Entrance Hall. And most people that pass through the doors are fooled into thinking my Ikea mirror tiles are actually a very large, very expensive mirror!
I think this is an awesome thing as I hate waiting in line for 20 minutes for beer when I go to the rugby. Anyhow as i don't know much more about the technology, people should surf on over to the Sydney Morning Herald Website HERE to learn more.
Patent marking
976 **D-VIII/14/1987. “The Pursuit of Happiness and the Practice of Law.” Law Firm Luncheon Meeting, Altheimer & Gray, Chicago, Illinois. (Incorporated in Item C-1999(16), above, pp. 406-15.)
Angelina will be super pissed all the hard work she has done over the last few weeks to make her look less like an Ice-Queen and more like a working mother has been undone with Star magazine publishing some VERY saucy photos. The pics are about 10 years old and show Angelina in some bondage gear and various stages of undress.
And not knowing, or ignoring the fact that when you say "I would have done it but I was too busy" you are saying "have" and not "of" is pretty poor in my quite honest opinion.
My son was magnanimous in defeat, relief, kids can be highly unpredictable. By all accounts several children throughout the day leave in tears "they couldn't handle the pressure or shame of defeat!". So onto the next match - wins! By this time I cannot focus on much more than the incoming texts with the latest results. I ask the hubster if he's as tense as me and he says "is that why your punctuation is so poor? I am chillaxing in my sons glory. He is even more relaxed than that!"
Before taking my mother-in-law (“suegra” in Spanish) and the rest of our family to the seashore mall known as Larcomar, having a wonderful buffet full of ceviche, pulpo (which would be octopus), and other assorted Peruvian cuisine at Mangos, and before snapping the picture that was featured here, we took the whole family unit to Inka Market so that mi suegra could browse for, shop for, and buy all manner of Peruvian crafts including scarves, jewelry, and gloves.
times the number in small by 7 for the month of July.
The next one was Chan Yeol. After he appeared, we realized this was not a dream. He wear white suit and jean. He’s very tall. And then Kai got down. He still dressed in the black clothes at the graduation ceremony. They walked very fast. We didn’t follow them, because our mind went completely blank and frozen there.
Nine course vegetarian degustation $180
Alpha Instinct
9) GRAVEYARD – The Phantom Five
So, it should be no surprise the area of secret research and development of APRA/NASA at HU, to create a “soldier-computer dyad where is little or no noticeable “demarcations between bodily existence and computer simulation, between cybernetic mechanism and biological organism”, a Barack Hussein Obama Cyborg.
I could hardly contain myself, but I didn't squeak a word of my good fortune!
The historical use of picture books were brought about by Noel Harrington. It was made cheaply as wartime books, by printing the whole book on one sheet of paper and folded in a certain way to make the book form. each page alternated in colour from full colour to black and white. it was printed directly from a lithographic stone and each colour was individually painted.
Then I saw the plastic bags, the modernity, though shabby!
*started throwing little fits when you don't get your way!
Luggage sleeve conveniently integrated in rear of case for maximum portability with any of our CODi wheeled cases
For three years now, people have been reading about the midlife transition from corporate life to teaching in the public schools of New Orleans that my wife and I made in 2008. After reading my recent post on some of the more positive (a relative term, to be sure) student interactions of the past year, my friend Kay (a follower of this saga from day one) sent me a response e-mail which simply said, “Okay….now I’m beginning to get it”…
Now I am left with this:
Gerald Moore's achievements as an accompanist are well-known, but I can find out little about Fritz Kitzinger, who copes splendidly with the very demanding piano part in the Bloch Suite. He seems to have been a vocal coach and conductor as well as a pianist; he married the noted piano pedagogue Adele Marcus in 1940. On records he also appeared as an accompanist for Charles Kullman, Ezio Pinza, and Friedrich Schorr, but this is his only collaboration with William Primrose.
We have a sponsor this week and it is Floppy Latte Designs. They
Like people, plants have their comfort levels. They also have critical temperature minimums and maximums. In general, temperatures between 65°F and 75°F during the daytime are best.
The simple and disappointing answer is ‘no.’
It has never been anything but a religion of the ambitious, dominating, and unscrupulous, with either a race or a caste arrogation of superiority over the races without or the herd within, an assumption of licence to act treacherously and injuriously towards aliens and those it deems of inferior breed and to confine its standards of honour and decency to those of its own blood or order. It is a code that Christianity has actively and passively resisted for two thousand years. That fact is not unimportant. For between the progress that has culminated in ergosophy and the Christian religion there is an intimate connection. Indeed the former is in origin wholly the product of the Christian nations of the West.
Whoops, sorry. Really... off to read now. :)
Im calling this Luna's birth story part one, because it kind of is...but isn't?
So yeah, I was not directed to be comfortable with wearing make-up. I can remember very rare times when my sister and I (or was it just me?) wore áo dài, powder, eye shadows, lipsticks, and heels from my mother (she didn’t wear make-up but she did receive make-up products as gifts) when we were very small. And perfume. (My father has passion for perfume. Probably I “inherited” it from him : p. I still remember one time my mother once received a box of powder with peach scent that I was so head over heels with its sweet and soft smell. When I think about it now, I still like it a lot. I mean, a lot.) From these very little things, with how few people around me who were interested in make-up (let alone use it, and look beautiful with it on), it’s difficult to explain why I have this special fondness in make-up.
Richard Wolstencroft, director of the Melbourne Underground Film Festival and the new Bloodfest Fantastique horror and sci-fi film festival, must have been every kid’s best friend when he was growing up.
1x Wordy bits
So thank you, God, for sending others to be your light, for sending others to comfort me, and to remind me that You were there all along.
It's not a record for a bright, sunny summer August day. For a chilly, windswept January winterscape, or blustery, rainy fall day with the onset of a brutal winter on the horizon, it's perfect. And while some songs individually are standouts, it's a record best enjoyed as a piece.
Although it more than doubled its revenue last year, Linkedin’s profits fell year-on-year, and its advertising income rose slower than from other sources. It now makes half of its money through selling its services to recruitment companies, who can post job listings and search for talent.
Ready was a known neo-Nazi and member of the National Socialist Movement. He was the leader of the U.S. Border Guards, a white supremacist militia group which patrolled the desert near the U.S./Mexico border. More
Quick plate interchange with 50mm lever clamp w Bubble Level.
It’s simple, really. Very, very few people are going to look at the news of the preliminary autopsy results this morning, when they open up their paper or turn on the morning news, and NOT think: You know, that could have waited until Henry was laid to rest today. People that knew him or his family, people that don’t, and pretty much everyone else with any sense of common decency.
Bauckham downplays these relatively insignificant arguments and gives priority to the prominent themes in Revelation – which are life-changing.
He was young, and his expression was less like a man and more like an old beached ship-worn by waves and salt, yet refusing to just simply slip back out into the sea and disappear. He gave me a big smile and said “brotha, where ya goin t’day? I’m just headin’ over to ma sistahs and I run outta gas. You got some change?”
“Well it’s not possible … that’s not in the remit of the Crisis Team.”
Time will tell, of course, whether I stick with it and create some new healthy habits. I’ll report back at the end of the month and let you know. I hope to also share some tricks/tips with you in case you want to give No-Spend February a shot.
I belong to God, my children, my family and I have defeated the false prophets, because the Spirit Who is in me is more powerful than the spirit in those who belong to the world! Amen!
Thanks again if you were in the audience, I did speak to some of you but not all. It was a wonderful evening and if you couldn’t make it I hope this post gives you a feel for the night. I’m loving this salon malarky, can you tell?
The good news is Jesus Christ; how that He “died for our sins according to the scriptures; and that he was buried, and that he rose again the third day according to the scriptures.” No, we don’t relate to man’s sin but rather to the righteousness of Jesus Christ. He can and will save all who come to Him by faith.
for getting your rug dirty
So, when Nadia and I started out this month, we had thrown together a last minute idea hoping for the best. What we got was an overwhelming response and an indescribable group of women that have touched my heart in more ways than I can count. So overwhelming, in fact, that we actually have a few days scheduled in June to fill out the overflow!
would not forget His hand in my life.
Joe McPhee Quartet - Legend Street One
A Quick Intro to Some Principles from Network Ethics
But you have to accept it. Say yes.
Watch out for more special offers throughout June.
This transparent Pet may be one of a kind. It can't be used because the film would be exposed, but it looks to be operational. It may have been a demonstration model. It is also an early model Pet. This sold for 39,500 yen! though having seen regular Pets go for $400 on eBay, maybe it doesn't seem so expensive.
Maybe you’ll realize that you don’t like the food or spice you try, or maybe you’ll wonder what took you so long to come around to it. Experiment. There’s a rainbow of nutrients out there.
1. Firstly, and arguably most importantly, is it true than you were brought up in the wilds of north England by a den of badgers? I merely raise this because of the bristling nature of your hair, or is it just some special shampoo you use?
and things are ridiculously busy with J's work right now,
How do you know where to find these challenges that we sponsor?
He looked away and stuttered his reply.
orange construction paper
And the Word became flesh and dwelt among us, and we have seen his glory, glory as of the only Son from the Father, full of grace and truth.
I like to keep my blog positive,
Countdownsploitation continues for better or worse. We're takin it all the way to ONE, baby!
-Clothing occurence: medium ?
I’d look at him with some surprise, saying, “Oh yes, that’s right! But I don’t remember telling you about that…”
Chapter: Polite Society (1)
A blog created by NY literary agent extraordinaire Janet Reid, Query Shark takes queries and viciously rips them to shreds. And then follows the ripping with sage advice and vaguely shark-themed non-sequitors, such as "Thanks for being my chum!" It's like she's some kind of half-shark-half-human mutant or something.
Warrior
Local TV news drops the ball again
Now, talking about the actual model. At first I didn’t like it for some reason. Maybe it’s because I had been staring at the classic version the whole time. I wasn’t a fan of his fluff to be honest either. But getting the new model out and getting it ready, it really impressed me with it’s size and overhauled detail. He really does look like a mountain of a man compared to the other warcasters like he’s supposed to. Plus that pose! You know I’m a fan of dynamic poses on miniatures!
The razor-sharpness and lightness of the Shun Fuji blade, combined with masterful control and balance in the hand, allow this knife to carve a clean, thin slice in a single stroke. Inspired by the high-performance knives used by Japanese chefs, our exclusive Shun Fuji collection represents the very best in Japanese cutlery craftsmanship.
Granted this fruit salad doesn't photograph great...it still has such an awesome flavor!!
For many years it was believed that the first map to mention the names of the mountains of Machu Picchu and Huayna Picchu was that drawn by the French explorer Charles Wiener in 1875, although he labelled the mountains the wrong way round. The previous year he had travelled to the Urubamba valley and once he had reached the town of Ollantaytambo he received information from the locals that fine Inca ruins lay further up the valley at a place called “Huaina-Picchu or Matcho-Picchu.” Upon hearing this he left to try to find these ruins by travelling, via a pretty circuitous route due to their being no other possible path at that time, up through the Panticalla pass and the Lucumayo valley to reach the same Choquechaca bridge that Antonio Raimondi had visited 16 years previously. From Choquechaca Wiener then decided to head further down-river, towards the plantation of Santa Ana rather than up-river which would have taken him towards Machu Picchu because of the difficulties heading in that directions would bring.
All the very best to Arjun Kapoor and Ishaqzade team. Mind blowing promo.
Yes! Fall is all about crisp air, longer nights, and the beginning of the holiday season, so you need to create warmth. Start by changing out the curtains – I’d go with velvet, silk or heavy canvas in a deep hue. I like charcoal grey, navy or black, myself. (I know it sounds heavy, but there’s a formality to darker window dressings that seems to fit the season – and you can always add bright color via pillows and rugs.)
Mr Cheung recalled that he was invited by the Motion Picture Association of America (MPAA) to come to Hollywood. There, he familiarised himself with the Three-Act Structure, which is a success formula to make a blockbuster movie. But, as Mr Cheung explained, it can be applied to reach his goal, namely to use IP trade to drive stakeholders' economic development. In Act I the context is given, Act II the challenge, and Act III the resolution. I am sure that the Hong Kong movie scene uses a similar scheme to keep the audiences captivated. Those Chinese from the Mainland, versed in Marxism, might recall the different acts as Hegel's thesis, anti-thesis, synthesis, respectively. So if Act I is the setting whereby Hong Kong is introduced as a Special Administrative Region with the ambition to become a regional knowledge hub, Act II is the challenge of how to get there? In other words, how to apply IP, how to monetise these intangible assets? Mr Cheung was inspired by a Japanese car manufacturer who was not interested in cars, but in the money that you can make with cars. This same approach should be followed with IP. (IP Dragon wonders whether it is really possible to exploit IP, without really loving it?). MBAs teach you many interesting things but not about the role of intangibles, Mr Cheung said. Therefore, we need to map out our niche, and make an inventory of what is already available, predict change, seize opportunity and collaborate to innovate, and execute these processes in parallel. Because, we live in an IP economy, Mr Cheung told. The significance becomes clear when one looks at the most valuable brand in the world: Coca-Cola (71,861 million U.S. dollar, according to Interbrand in October 2011). If all tangibles are destroyed, Coca-Cola could resurrect itself because of the worth of its intangibles. IP can be lucrative, even though it is sometimes tiny. For example Mr Cheung knows the composer of the two second jingles.
The world must find itself within itself; then it must find itself within the universe that surrounds it.
~Dreamville Retro Bake Shop~
I didn't say no.
The Clock – 2
MNCSM, part of MNC®, is an integrated marketing and technology services firm. We
While there, he’s presented with breakfast in bed. The scene was inspired by my realisation that there wasn’t a single thing on a typical 21st century breakfast tray that he would recognise. Since he believes he’s in Elfland, where no mortal who wishes to escape must eat or drink, he is doubly determined to resist all offers of food.
What I love about this film are the characters. Drew Barrymore is as cute as ever or should I say, cute lady with a foul-mouth. Her boy-toy, Justin Long, marked this film as his leading man debut. We cannot deny the chemistry between the two. C’mon, the kissing scenes with tongue, who does that? Most films fake kissing scenes, that is, without tongue, but they dated so I guess it’s okay.
Two Christmas stories come together in the book When Love Finds You Under the Mistletoe, one from the past and one from the present.
* 1 diced head of broccoli
But we are.
You never can tell how close you are it may be near when it seems so far.
My Dad’s just ordered a replacement treadmill – the one I broke had lasted 17 years apparently, so wasn’t too much a decision to order a successor from the same company – which is now en route – hoorah! Hopefully home training will resume soon – I have managed one swim and lots of baby weight training in the meantime, though.
Are you into the iPhone or over all the hype?! Truth be told, I'm so not the electronic-savvy kind of gal and if it weren't for my hubby, I'd probably still have my old Nokia. I get used to what I know, and am usually reluctant to make changes. I'm trying to learn though and now I've got my eye on the WHITE iPhone.
Along his travels, the angel feels a prayer from a father whose child (daughter) is not home this holiday season. The story never says why she is not home, why she is wandering the streets of New York City; only that the father does not know what has driven a divide between he and his daughter.
It was a crippling sort of shyness that hindered me from expressing myself and connecting with people. I’d try to clear my throat and attempt to say something. Screech. Stop. Silence. My shyness would let me hear a brake screeching to a halt, gridlocked in the traffic of doubts, ensuring that my voice would be there, on a standstill, jammed at the back of my throat.
We don’t have nepotism…..we have Family Values.
6) People leave their barky dogs outside longer, and more often. This means less sleep for me.
I’d ask you to think about this in your life, with a current goal that you’re working on. Remove the option of failing by knowing you are in control of succeeding. Yes it may take longer to achieve than expected, it may be harder than first thought but there’s always a choice on how you view your success.
The blank stare on my face is interrupted by the whistling between Gonzalo and don Miguel, who are singing aloud in a childish, sing-song manner with each other, “la mierda pequeña, la mierda pequeña.” Steve laughs out loud when he makes out their lyrics, and turns to me to gauge my reaction. I’m unsure of how to react, so I don’t. However, they continue singing and laughing while looking at me, so I ask Steve what they’re saying.
Protect your data!
All of the above photographs
20% Off this whole weekend
Since I was using that first image as my reference and haven't worked on this book in months, I forgot that I got rid of the blindfold... but you can see that I'm thinking about the characters more three-dimensionally. And since I knew I could redraw the page if I made a mistake, my line work is bolder and more confident.
Once you have your hardware assembled, upload the following sketch. Now for desk jockeys such as myself, there is a catch, as a GPS receives signals from satellites the receiver will need to be in line of sight with the open sky. If you have your desk next to a window, or a portable computer you’re in luck. Look at the LED on your GPS receiver – if it is blinking, it has a lock (this is what you want); on - it is searching for satellites; off - it is off (!). Frankly I though it would blink for searching, and be on for satellite lock. Moving along…
Posted by Justin "The Claw" at 1:42 PM 0 comments
Beer Log: That same afternoon after Annabelle's
Next I gotta say I really dig this t-shirt. I like it's minimalist design just a black background with the logo off to the side. It's like you can show that you're a comic book and or Checkmate fan with out looking like a nerd at the same time which could make all the difference between a fanboy who might as well be a born again virgin and one who actually has some kind of sex life.
...I think that I am single-handedly keeping the vending machine people that service the Coke machine at my work in business. In related news, it would seem likely that I will soon single-handedly be keeping my hyper-tension and diabetes doctor in business if I can't quit my pop habit. Oh, and my wine gum habit too. And my cupcake habit. And my ice cream habit. And...
The market even has its own chapel, honoring the Virgin of Guadalupe, where vendors make their final rite of passage upon passing away. This market is not only a place of tradition, it is a place of family, home and life.
The last days of summer are upon us and once again I wonder where the summer went. Thank goodness I have the foresight to take photos else I would think my entire summer was wasted. Just looking at these wonderful images lets me know that my efforts were not in vain and the fruits of my labor, although fleeting, were well worth the effort.
Career Opportunities
20. . . pay off my friend Roxanne’s library fines & buy her son Riley an unlimited supply of Red Bull. Hope & pray he does not become a raging addict, which would so completely negate the benefit of a zero balance library card.
After Y2K, Kirk became more and more consumed by the counter-terrorism world. He was read into higher and higher clearances, learned more and more about the largest threats to the US and her allies. Specifically he became deeply aware of Osama Bin Ladin and his organization.
So not only are most people dealing with the 'initial' disease or condition that they have been diagnosed with, but now also have to deal with living IN pain 24/7.
Squatters Hop Rising
The reaction to his remarks from certain quarters was all too predictable.
The new forgiveness of the masses is now bestowed upon a certain Ross Barkley esquire. We have barely seen anything of the boy however the clamour for him to start every game is ridiculous. In the games he has played he has done ok but nothing exceptional yet. But our insatiable hunger for a new hero warps our perceptions of a young player still finding his feet and recovering from an horrific injury. Each pass he misplaces is instantly forgiven. he is young, at least he’s trying. Great idea, almost pulled it off. How long this lasts for I know not, however the perception pendulum for young Ross is currently at its peak. I only hope he is prepared for when it begins to swing the other way.
54,211 FC runs with 124 centuries at 39.45
Rather than sell a stake in its company to local investors, Microsoft has opted to empower between five and 10 small information technology businesses in an equity equivalence deal worth R492 million.
Field report: Its subject should be fieldwork conducted by the author(s). It should be of 1000-2000 words in length. It can also include clearly labelled and numbered b/w photographs, artwork, tables, or maps, provided that the copyright of these falls into one of the three above-listed categories. The article should be preceded by a 100-word abstract, and its main text should be split into four sections – Introduction, Description (in which the fieldwork undertaken is described), Results, Discussion (which should also include details of any future plans). A reference list can be included at the end of the article; if so, this and the accompanying in-text citation style should correspond with the preferred version outlined below.
I've also been going through old family photo albums to find favorites to include in vintage frames surrounding our guestbook. I also found a wonderful vintage book of sheet music I plan on using to create the cones for petal-tossing after the ceremony. And I plan on saving them for use in future holiday parties.
7 Pot White 0/2
Not the light-one-tear-trickling-down-your-cheek kind of cry.
And so I wonder. What has Satan tried to stop in my life? What part of my destiny has he overheard, and whispered “No!”, because he knows that my destiny fulfilled will not be good for him?
As a psychology grad student, I know that this behavior - the re-evaluation of a commitment during that in-between time after deciding to commit (e.g., engagement) and before the commitment becomes finalized (e.g., marriage) - is completely normal. It happens with small decisions and large, good decisions and bad; this psychological reflex does not discriminate, particularly if you have a pragmatic style of thinking.
And here is the card I made. I forgot all about this 2-pc Quickutz bell die I've had for a long time, so I used it for the main focus of the card. I embossed a piece of white card stock with gold ep and used it to cut the top of the bell, then die cut the bottom layer with cherry cobbler. I added some tiny ivory pearls from Pizzazz Aplenty inside the holes on the bell as well as on the punched border. The gold-embossed sentiment is by SNSS and I used BoBunny dsp throughout, with some dark green cardstock for the SB scalloped circle. The main circle was sponged with Ranger antique linen ink, and the gold ribbon is from my stash. The bell is popped up on dimensionals.
CHINESE FIGHT FINANCIAL BATTLE BY BUYING REAL ASSETS
complete with its five dancer's toes!
Taken: 10/17/2011
Or even better, there's a cemetery behind our store. Go take a dump out there!
I saw the difference them made, I handed them to crying bleeding, traumatized women and children…. I used one for ten days.
-Massive central bank intervention to save too big to fail banks
She Hates Me
A thrill divine
The acting in the film is universally corny, but it comes with the territory. I didn't sign up for this expecting brilliance. There are some dramatic scenes, still though, that will have you gritting your teeth.
So October 14th 2009 was the last time I posted anything here. Seeing as we're now in a new decade I thought I should post something. If not just to say Happy New Year to the few straggling readers I have left.
I watched a documentary recently about foreign aid from the developed countries to the third world countries. The statistics about the strings attached to such aids as well as the interests on debts costs so much that these third world countries have no prayer of recovering and developing if they honour the repayments and interest payments on such debts. These debts are linked to austerity measures and structural adjustment programs that seem to incapacitate the countries more in the end than they would have been had the help not been offered. For every aid or debt given, a greater amount is taken out. The dilema for the third world countries is that they have no immediate ways out of their crisis which does not depend in one way or another on foreign intervention. Often foreign trade is so unfairly done that earnings will never be enough without it being supplemented by debts or aids.
Still, for written copy that one supposes has been reviewed more than once, I get critical. In my mind. Not out loud.
Its something quite personal but i just wanted to share hope you will like it or you will get serious in achieving your goal…..
“That is preposterous!...It is not irrational to be nervous after 911 if you see some conspicuous Muslim fellas get in their first class section of a plane as I have!”
E – is for Evaluate. The key to becoming a superstar at Time Management is to constantly evaluate what is working and what isn’t. At the end of the day when you are making your Map for the next day you need to reflect upon the day that has passed and ask yourself what worked/what didn’t? How would you handle things differently next time?
Basil Leaves, 10 pcs
No Apology, the Case for American Greatness, by Mitt Romney, St. Martin’s Press, 2010
It's all coming along very nicely and now it's onto the top row and the last three pages, so exciting to get so close to finishing!
I missed the bus and there'll be hell today,
Then there's the Nobel Prize-winning Irish poet Seamus Heaney. His poem Sloe Gin is one of the rare ones that caught my eye, if not my imagination. Sloes are tart, plum-like fruits culled from hedgerow bushes called blackthorn. In rural parts of the British Isles and isolated spots in North America, the berries are pricked (or sometimes frozen to break down cell walls), then immersed in sugar or syrup and gin, vodka, or other spirits for a long maturation. Regardless of the spirit used, the resulting cordial is a stillroom favorite always dubbed sloe gin.
www.brightcove.com/media
P.S. I really need a haircut, my hair is currently four inches longer and flat, flat, flat because all the layers grew out! I'll be finding a great local Seattle place to visit soon and hopefully revive the mop on my head soon because these pictures are making me jealous. Do you just KNOW when you need a haircut or do you go regularly?
Specializing with dementia and Alzheimer’s patients, Andrea has helped hundreds of families cope with difficult life situations, as well as the loss of a family member. Listening, coaching, and engaging people in her educational programs is key to her leadership approach. Her common sense style lets participants examine the grieving process by “taking a step back and viewing the situation from a fresh new perspective”.
1. Be Prepared
That was a stupid question. I’d still be fucking Telea.
Kevin Nathaniel Colbert, 25, New York, N.Y.
Had the best time.
"provides an overview of the national patent litigation systems across the European Patent Organisation's 38 Contracting States. This study presents an at-a-glance description of the different national revocation, nullity and infringement procedures currently in place. The competent courts dealing with these matters at first instance and appeal are also depicted".I found out about this from the excellent Axel Horns, whose IP::JUR weblog contains a bright, articulate and thoroughly justified rant at the EPO's decision to limit access of this presumably useful document to those who fill in a form which gives the EPO a good deal of personal data which, one might think, is irrelevant to the discharge of its functions.
If you're into metal I wholly suggest this little undiscovered gem. It's catchy, easy to listen (that is, if you usually listen to metal) and flows really fast. Great album overall.
i think the biggest pro to tweeting is growing my business. the more connections i make, the better. the biggest drawback to tweeting (for me) is the distraction it could provide. i get distracted. a lot. one night i said to my husband... i think i have add. his reply with no hesitation... oh, i KNOW you do. seriously, honey?? yes, i do have to make major efforts to stay on task during my work day. working alone at home does not help. one more social media site is not going to help this.
We can't let that happen.
While there is the potential to make a good showing next year in the metric mile, I’m much more concerned about our prospects moving forward in the 800 meters. We only have one athlete running under 1:44.00 (Nick Symmonds, 1:43.83) in an event that typically finds the best athletes UNDER 1:43 in an Olympic season. Which means getting into a position to medal will be near impossible unless the pace goes very slow – something almost unlikely to happen with David Rudisha and Abubaker Kaki in the race.
A: Well, I mean, that’s what it is. I doodoo and then listen to Katy Perry.
You will see I have finally crumbled and given into the tempation of 'Distress Ink', my lovely Mum has treated me to an ink pad and tool which I have been umming and ahhring over buying for a while, I have got one for now just to have a try, vintage photo, as I will use that colour most for aging papers but I'm sure I will end up with more :o)
We in the British Freedom Party though are the first party to offer sensible, moderate and principled nationalist policies whilst being firmly determined to reverse the wrongs of the past forty years.
I swear you could pour chlorella cream all over a compost heap and I would probably dive in. Embarrassing? Maybe.
Nota bene!! There may be a few items added for 2012 which are not included here. We are still reviewing new documents talking about the transition to the STAAR Test; there are suggestions that a few new subjects may be added. These reviews should cover more than 95% of the material on the test, however.
Dr. Isabelle Catoni, a Parisian dermatologist who tried it herself, offered the following advice for women who will run to their favorite stores the second the Clarasonic is available in France:
But the current was strong, really strong! I tried to climb back on the wood, but the water was pulling me so bad. Mom tried to grab me, but she wasn't fast enough, and I got pulled right under the wood! I could hear footsteps on the wood, and yelling. I tried to turn around and swim back but the water was too fast and I couldn't breathe! When I stuck my head up, it bumped wood and I couldn't get to the air.
I wanted to talk about Marriage. Last Sat me and Kellie went to Kellie's grandparents 58th wedding anniversary. Yeah you read that right, 58th. That is truly amazing.
Every other week or so I like to feature a business run by a SAHM. This week I asked my friend Laural about being a Pampered Chef consultant. This great company sells high-quality cookware at affordable prices. I just ordered a couple these two items and can’t wait for them to come in.
My advice to you all is never turn down a chance to do a project yourself. The pride, sense of accomplishment, and satisfaction in your work and yourself afterwards is irreplaceable… but, if you’re not too confident in your handy abilities, then maybe the DIY network is a good place to start!
(2) We should drill in the Gulf of Mexico too!
Among Brazilians who earn more than ten times the minimum wage, 4% of the population, Dilma’s popularity experienced the biggest rise, at a rate of 17%, having jumped from 53% to 70%.
“Ah well, there were many strange events along the way of our adventure. In fact we met with a very frightening man in black platemale down in the tunnels beneath Dunn’s Bridge who … I know it sounds unbelievable… who sucked the time out of a man’s body. He crumpled into dust along his left side after that, I’m told”
A few pics to entice you:
eventually will make us!
A slave does not remain in a household forever, but a son always remains.
I don’t care, the game works for me! Just seems little strange that EA would let such a popular game from a popular franchise languish like this.
Matter: Uncreated materials used by God to create the universe. Refined matter is known as “spirit.” What the difference is between matter and refined matter is anyone’s guess.
I am currently working on a 'Learn to Sew' post, another request from a reader. This will really start at the basics and what you need to get started. If you have any ideas of things you would like included, please leave a comment or email you - I'd love to hear from you.
January 11 - David Nelson, actor ("The Adventures of Ozzie & Harriet"), 74
Hague Abduction Convention cases are heard by the Family Law Division of the Tribunal de Grande Instance in the region in which the child is located.
J.K Rowling, who may have single-handedly inspired a whole generation of kids to love books, had her first Harry Potter book rejected by a dozen publishers (including Penguin and HarperCollins). It was finally picked up by a small London publisher whose 8-year-old daughter begged him to print it. (Our debt to that little girl is great.)
So, was with King David, when King David goes before the Lord, the Lord God forgave all his sins and remember them no more. God saw Jesus Christ who was to come, during the times of King David, Jesus Christ had not come yet, but because of Jesus Christ who was to come, who has now come for the forgiveness of all the sins of all people, the Adultery and Murdering that King David did was forgiven, Washed Cleansed, Pure and Made Holy. During those days the Blood of the lamb was used to represent the Blood of Jesus Christ, but since Jesus Christ came to die for all people and shed His blood on the Cross once and for all, even today all our sins are forgiven for whoever believe in Jesus Christ. In the Bible, (Hebrews 10:10) , we find that “We have been made holy through the sacrifice of the body of Jesus Christ once for all.”
One of the Saudi public organizations in the city of Mecca started for the first time to organize a beauty contest for children, where "a child beauty queen" would be selected, which in itself is a provocative innovation in a conservative Saudi society.
Simple Math
I couldn't figure out what was going on until I looked up bread and sugar on the internet. Low and behold it brought forth the word Candida. Candida is a fungus and overgrowth of the bad Yeast baceteria in and on the outside of our bodies. This bacteria is EVERYWHERE! In the air we breath, food we eat and etc. We've all got it, lots of it. :)
that matters,
I heard a laugh that was closer than I wanted it to be. My heart stuttered. Come on Simon, ask her.
E: The Exorcism Era (Early to mid 70's)
Shelf Life:Taste best when ate straight away from handi (Ok...not actually, but do consume right away)
I am sitting here wracking my brain for a topic to discuss in my next post. I have drawn a blank. I need some inspiration other than the usual suspects on the internet. Then the proverbial light bulb went off. (I know, very cliché; but I am only on my first cup of coffee this morning.) Somewhere I had a binder of musings and personal reflections spanning my high school years. Maybe they would provide some encouragement. You see, back when I was young and naive, I was going to be the great struggling writer allowing my career as a political journalist to finance the dream.
Finally, the third problem not only affects you but also other spies on your team; those pretty statues, while sometimes put into hilarious postures, are basically a flashing reminder to your enemies to spycheck more; on top of that, to expect the spy to use a spycicle and deal with him accordingly (as described above). They’re paranoia generators, and as any good spy will tell you, paranoia is your biggest enemy.
Cliff, along with his daughter Hilaire Richey Kallendorf, wrote ACING DEPRESSION: A TENNIS CHAMPION'S TOUGHEST MATCH, which was published by New Chapter Press in 2010. Cliff uses the book – and his mental health advocacy talks, to help educate people about depression and provide for hope of improving their lives.
Add the garlic, dried herbs ( basil,oregano, rosemary,thyme etc. mixed) and cook for 5 minutes.
I'm also out of touch with kitchen trends, I don't know what's in and out, but I've reached a place where I don't give a doodly squat. I just have to do what works for our family.
According to Staf de Wilde the Catholic church is standing in front of a firm dogmatism and for a pyramidal, say dictatorial structure in which the basis church has to squeak little or nothing. Him remains it surprising that critical religious people within this institute wishes to remain active. According to him an organized belief community does not really has to be church with the qualities of the church of Rome. And as you take away these qualities, then you hold something else over: something resembling the original Christianity perhaps, at that time there did not exist yet an infallible pope and yet no dogmas.
This shutting of the door is significant in several ways.
Remember that we live in New Hampshire, and this being the high holy season of a Presidential Primary, we have access to all of the potential candidates. It’s not unusual for me to get several invites every week to see and ask questions of those who are running. I can go to Holiday walks, living room meetings, and even chili fests (to this day, my kids will tell you that John Kerry had the best chili ever.) And of course, when I’m wearing my journalistic hat, I even get to join the press corps to get interviews (have I told you how I was almost arrested when President Obama came to a town hall event because I had inadvertently followed his car too closely after the event?)
Take client photos frequently, as images and video drive the viral nature of social network. Digital cameras know take still images and video. Make sure that the images are professional looking and truly show highly skilled images. Have a model release ready to have the client sign-off so you can post the images to your blog, #Pinterest, #website, or#Facebook. Remember, those images just stay relevant at that time they were posted, frequency is key. Just don’t’ post once a day, several times a day is important.
The Angel Therapy Handbook is a ‘vital reference tool that you can refer to again and again’, the critic’s say. “Another Angel book by Doreen?” I hear you say. Aaahhh, but this time it’s different. THIS TIME Doreen gives you handy tools, knowledge and wisdom to tuck away in your Angel tool box.
628 days
I believe that we evolve naturally toward this one­ self if we allow it to happen. We begin our lives vulner­able and depend on our parents to feed us, clean us, and comfort us. When we need these things, we cry to get our needs met. Survival is our primary concern; we are always surveying for danger and seeking safety as we age.
I studied English Literature and Language at Oxford University and learnt lots about analysing books and talking about them. After I left uni, I worked for a year going to state schools around the country talking to young people about higher education and its benefits. I realised how important books were to raising aspirations and how they had raised my aspirations as a child without me even really noticing! After that epiphany, I knew I wanted to work with books—writing them and editing them.
Desription:It is about an “ordinary” boy who has no idea how much power he has. Until
The PS Vita is the most powerful, dazzling and impressive handheld games console ever built.
An estimated 17,000 collectors, curators, architects, interior designers, art advisors and new enthusiasts attend the New York exposition annually.
08-Flee-Rekkers - Brer Robert
The council says it will consult on the options for re-housing tenants from Ibbotson and Lonsbrough Flats before a final decision is made.
A note, a warning
Find little tricks to get those new foods into their little bodies.
-Likes to pee on people (we all have our talents, don't we?)
I’ve spent the last 3 days guiding with some regulars from Texas from Rim Shoals to Bull Shoals and the river, our river,s is gorgeous in her spring cloak with the filamentous algae bloom waning and the water clear and clean.
The concept first took shape when one of their research subjects abruptly expired. They had never seen anything like it. To see that moment when the light dimmed from the subjects eyes was more exhilarating then he had anticipated. His colleagues were equally captivated by the process. What was it like for them in that moment ? What did they feel in that moment while their brain began shutting down? They discussed it relentlessly, researched the subject of death in poetry, pictures, medical journals but nothing compared to actually being witness to it. When the project was first suggested he argued over the relevance of such an undertaking but as a scientist his thirst for knowledge and the excitment over having a new puzzle to solve finally won out. They planned it out carefully setting several guidelines the first of which was to see to it that none of their subjects was caused any undue pain. Sometimes however he saw fear in the subjects eyes and he wondered why they feared what was happening? Wasn’t it just a transition from one state to another? He questioned whether or not the experiment was causing the subjects mental anguish and suggested that perhaps they should consider doing the study on a lower species but his colleagues argued that an unintelligent creature would only reveal the physical transition between life and death and that only a high functioning specimen had the capability to articulate the mental process they under went at the point of death. What did the subject feel at the moment of death? What was their last conscious thought? Why did they fear their death? A lower life form had no way to answer those things the way a human specimen could.
That of a dream that’s left me
The young Hamilton woman’s controller had all the trademarks of a Mac daddy pimp — she believed he loved her.
“I must admit I was a bit disappointed and it was all a bit self-conscious,” the 28-year-old said.
Fall 2011:
At work I had the craziest project. There were seventeen power-point projects created by a team of people that after they were generated someone pointed out that maybe they should all be on the same template. Cart before horse, anyone? So step one was picking a template that was easy to manipulate with our logo and a few other details. Step two was to get everyone to agree said template was good enough (amazingly, one round of emails with no dessent). It took two days to migrate the modified template into each of the documents and then change some spacing issues in each one. DONE.... whew
Justice sources say three of the 34 accused will not face criminal charges but will be released on so-called "peace bonds" ordering them to have no contact with fellow gang members. The remaining 31 are facing a variety of charges, including drug trafficking, conspiracy, money laundering, participating in a criminal organization and obstruction of justice. All of those who have been arrested will make their first court appearance this morning in Winnipeg. Manitoba Attorney General Andrew Swan said Wednesday's arrests are just the beginning.
The dogmatic and the blind
Sweet and strong, and ah? so patient,
I guess I don't mind so much—it will give me an extra dose of giddiness when the sunshine and warmth returns.
‘Do you see them?’
Track listing for Sing a Song With Riddle:
Anyway, Tuesday the plumber came and assessed the situation. Wednesday the pipes were replaced. Thursday they did leak checks (oh and now my living room is completely covered in tarps) and said they had to leave the ceiling open for another whole week just to be sure and to air it out. I spent most of that week living solely in my bedroom, which is full of my kitchen stuff, and now had to spend yet another week living the same way.
A simple one off cost of £200 + VAT (which is relevant for all Paperback books with a black and white interior) - if you require something different, have a look at 'What else can you offer?' (Coming Soon), or feel free to ask, and a specific quote can be requested.
While monozygotic twins still provide dozens of unanswered questions to science, it's nice to see that they can be rather beautiful subjects for portrait photography enthusiasts.
Silver zippers? check.
‘So you come here to soak up some life before you head back to the quiet of nature?’
This is the way I fluff the pillows because this is where he will rest his head.
Swift has sailed into his rest.
"It was hard freezing her expressions there. In the editing room, it looked very sharp and nice so I did it elsewhere in the film, but it can quickly get to be a habit. I stopped doing it after a few films. I stopped using it as a visual effect. Now I use freeze frames only for dramatic effect. They're interesting providing viewers don't notice. You sense them, but an image is only perceptible — it takes eight frames for a shot to register. Fewer than eight frames and it's virtually unreadable, unless it's a tight close-up."
My favorite authors, who I hope have been positive influences on all of my writing, not just the novel are:
1 fossil
I'm actually not as much a fan of Werther as I am of Manon, Thais or even Don Quixote, basically because it's less rapturously erotic than the former two, and not as pathos ridden as the latter, but it still hits the spot often and with force! Dramatically, this production didn't convince, but I think the opera could work if it were more imaginatively directed, and had a far better actor as the lead. As it stood, it was an enjoyable evening, mainly for the music and visuals.
Forget dieting! It’s all about metabolism to melt the fat away, but what is metabolism?
I tried kale for the first time just last year and loved it. Since then though I've only used it a handful of times, mostly in pasta dishes. Although I love the flavor and texture I didn't really know what else to do with it.
Many products on the market have both technologies included: NFC chips and EMV capabilities. But getting both systems to work together, and then getting a processor to accept the whole process, are remarkably different matters.
Evan began to notice that there were very few men in the village, and that most of them were crippled. And then there was the sound of galloping horses. Women on horses. Riding in the night.
It could be 100 degrees outside and I will always wear long pants and long shirts, 3/4 length sleeve is the shortest I go haha I know that may sound completely insane, but I work in TV, our air conditioning is on 24/7, 365! And my house is usually ice berg cold during the summer so needless to say…I’m always cold and I love it lol
Helm anchored the band with his unique vocals and minimalist drumming. And don’t forget his acting: he was wonderful as Loretta Lynn’s father in “Coal Miner’s Daughter.”
Aired with poetic symmetry
Publisher: Discovery House Publishers (April 1, 2011)
Where is the cry of “keeping faith with those who wore the uniform of our country” that we heard back when Kerry was campaigning for the highest office in the land?
Something really cute happened today…
Christie:
2) Clean out excess toys and items. Give the kids an allotted space, (i.e. so many tubs, so many shelves) and box everything else up for storage or giveaway. This cuts down on clutter and makes clean up easier. It also keeps comfort items or favorite toys close.
We bid a fond (and hopefully temporary) farewell to Sony Christoph this week. She's stepping down due to her current course load, which sounds positively monstrous. Good luck and hang in there, Sony!
Honestly, I'll be glad when the holiday season is well behind us.
There is no pressure on me lol.. but weren't the DT projects over the last fortnight fabulous?
2010.09.05 Pakistan Punjab 1 0 An oil rig driver is killed by Islamic snipers.
Here are some more pictures to inspire you to get started! :)
--The game recognises and rewards math improvement, not just perfection. This builds confidence and propels children naturally towards complete mastery.
Somehow I think we'll survive.
The design perfectly accentuates the brand’s core products – men’s formal shirts, in the generously fitting Classic, streamlined Slim Fit, and body skimming Super Slim Fit – All complimented by an extensive and impressive range of ties. The range also has a more relaxed casual collection which includes a selection of stylish Polo shirts. Furthermore, Thomas Pink offers accessories such as cufflinks, socks, boxer shorts, hankies and bow ties. Also available is Pink Woman, a collection of women’s shirts, tunics and dresses, as well as a selection
I replied, “Up to you.”
Brilliant. Utterly brilliant. Everyone embraced me and made me feel so comfortable. I wasn’t present for the table read, or any of the rehearsals – that was the original actor – so it must have been amazingly stressful for Hanna and Billie not knowing who they were acting opposite until the cameras started rolling. But they were very lovely and generous in what was an unusual situation.
If you have energy in your communication with one of your clients you might try this for yourself. We never have to wait and worry. We can take charge, change the energy and move forward to meet our goals.
"Impact Investing"
Caribou Barbie @ Kissinger Associates Inc., 350 Park Ave, NY – MK-Beta programming is “ANYTHING, ANYTIME with ANYONE” (who has keys/codes) – “power is the ultimate aphrodisiac” – Henry Kissinger, New York Times, 1971
Dedicated
Kiko flowers result in yellow and nogal (or walnut) in dark brown or black.
The crust was rolled out with a (moist) rolling pin, transferred to a teflex sheet and dehydrated at 105°F for 1 hr, flipped, scored into individual slices before it got too dry, and dehydrated another 5 hours.
I will teach 100 bible studies, even 365 youth lessons, and know that… all that is helping to:
It was no longer a losing fight.
It's ten times (or fifty times, or, I don't know...) harder for us to proclaim a message of moral living when at the heart of "Rich-and-Powerful"-world, corruption seems the way to go. Seriously you leaders, GET YOUR ACT TOGETHER! Please. Thank you.
“They had an effect on how we played,” said Adeeb Mahfoudh. “I think they had something to do with our losing the match.”
08 Then I Kissed Her
.....he loves everybody just the way they are
Junsu went to open the door. “Nugu…” his word stopped. He startled seeing someone in front of him. His body trembling, he step back.
VATS returns, so if (like me) you’re an appalling shot in real time you can pause the action, choose a limb and let loose that way instead. Thankfully my favourite aspect from Fallout 3, the ‘Mysterious Stranger’ perk, is present and correct here as well – which helped me out on many occasions.
Meet me here,
Well consider me your trainer. I am saying to you, “you got this!” “you’re unstoppable!” Rest for a moment and regroup. But when that bell sounds, I charge you to plow throw that adversity, that fatigue, that discouragement, that doubt, those haters like a bull in a china shop! Bull dog tenacity. Rest if you must, but when that bell sounds its time to go get it, get it! Bliss and Blessings!
I quickly pinned the recipe and moved on. But I couldn't stop thinking about those brownies. So I popped back over to read the ingredients. I had everything...except the walnuts. Dangit!
Cyber citizens: BOO!!! Gaya-gaya
The trading platform is simply the software in which you execute the trades from the front end. Metatrader and Oanda are two such platforms. I use Metatrader. However, the two are linked, because the broker, I believe, ultimately determines which platform you will use. It is possible some brokers allow use of both, but I haven’t looked into that.
When the anesthesiologist came back to get Lily, she just went right to her, no tears, no drama, just stuck her thumb in her mouth and put her arm around her neck and stared into her face like "who is this nice lady coming to get me?". I did cry a bit, but only briefly, because right after that Jason came in to wait with us. He wasn't working today, so he had to time to come...Josiah was up at the heart center, or he would have been there too. In fact all of my children wanted to be there, but we told them that probably wouldn't go over very well in short stay surgery :)
it has produced.
2 :: Large-scale pieces work in small spaces
NO SURPRISE
I wondered why my friend was not supposed to let on about being a judge? I'd think that must be counterproductive, since it makes it much harder for musicians with no real knowledge of the folk scene to get their stuff heard by people with influence. And this in turn would create a bit of a ghetto-ish vibe.
Fast forward a few years to the current year. Melissa’s fiancé had just received a new job but it meant that the two would have to move back to her home town. She didn’t mind though, her family lived there. She hadn’t seen her own family in so long.
The ambiguity surrounding some Islamist powers involved in Middle East revolts raise questions in the West about the trajectory in which ongoing turmoil is taking the region. Skepticism is exacerbated by the fact that some Al-Qaeda affiliates are enthusiastically talking about the opportunities that change in the Middle East holds for them. Lessons learned from Iraq’s transformation suggest two things; that the emergence of even a stumbling democracy makes extremists more vulnerable to change themselves, and that the potential for evolution towards democracy is greater than that for relapse towards theocracy. The international community should therefore remain engaged until that outcome is achieved.
Then you mention that of all your kids, your eldest child was the one who received several of her baby shots. Lets’s face it, you realise because she is your first child, you didn’t know what was going on back then and you followed everyone’s bad advise blindly. You gave her those shots because you just did not know any better. The drug companies and quacks capitalize on your ignorance. Please let THAT sink in. Nodding her head, Doc dives back into her books. Next you hear the most troubling news. There are 5 diseases which have plagued humans since time began. She names them: Leprosy, TB, syphilis, gonorrhea, cancer and………. By then you stop listening because your mind is racing, connecting all of the dots and now everything you ever suspected is confirmed as truth. These diseases can be traced back to ancestral family lines and a family can be predisposed to one of those diseases because of an ancestor who had the disease and that’s how diseases become hereditary. She mentions that the disease gets activated in a person through trauma or get ready, drum roll please….VACCINES! You are dumb founded and relieved to finally be getting some answers.
What, exactly, do we mean when we say ‘good’ man?
These Books are re-telling the story of Gawain or Percivel; the Knights who come into the Chateau Marvielle; the evil Sorcerer Klingsor’s Castle of Wonders, with all its Illusions, Flower-Maidens/Harlots who are both Vestal Virgins/Temple Prostitutes and they experience forced decisions into deceptive choices for the Greater of Two Evils… and THIS is what part of the God-Game among the “Elites” of the Ruling Classes to this day IS:
So, Malchezaar had Gorehowl, right? And at some point some Horde adventurers went in there and handed him his ass, and got Gorehowl from his body, and somehow or other it found its way back to Thrall, who gave it to me. So far so good. But every so often, the freaky bizarro zone up there kicks in, and sets off some kind of a time loop. So all of a sudden, Mechazzar is up and kicking again, and he’s got Gorehowl back on him, and what do you know, poof, wherever Gorehowl WAS, it’s not there anymore. Because it got time-loop-reset back up to Prince Fancypants up there in Karazhan.
But believe I am completely fine
A few weeks ago Wes at Amanti Vino convinced me to pick up a bottle of Echeverria Late Harvest Sauvignon Blanc, 2007. He knows I love a good dessert wine and assured me this was worthwhile. Not only was the bottle sold in an elegant tube package, but at $19.99, what did I have to lose? And as I was walking out the door to the birthday party, I remembered the bottle and threw it in my cooler bag (along with my fruit salad and sparkling water - I'm not completely blinded by my wine-colored glasses).
He heard something stir from behind him, from the other side of his open screen door. Something in his house had moved—a peculiar occurrence, being that he lived alone. But things had been moving by themselves within his house a lot over the past few weeks. There had also been voices, groaning whispers that he couldn’t understand.
Both our hearts ached then,
For two decades the frog has been in the pot while the temperature has been slowly turned up. Yesterday, it was finally cooked and served to the American people in a sauce so thick as to cover the rancid flavor of the dish.
Carrot cake. You either love it or hate it, right?
Suggested further reading:
(Emphasis added.)
Anyways, I am really excited to start following other great blogs :)
Wild birds sing my names.
It’s all good.
Britain has a history of riot, one that stretched from Watt Tylor to the Poll Tax. After every one the state seeks to demonise those who took part, ruin their lives and crush their communities, only to admit ten years later that they had a point. We should all work to stopping that happening again.
God evening friends!
The composition of the trunk varied in density and uniformity. As I studied the trunk my attention was that of fingering a button on my shirt or scratching at my side. In this world of edgeless blurred vibration, I could not tell what part of the tree trunk was the tree and what part was me. Don’t ask me how or why this was the case. It just was.
Welp, it's been quite a while since I posted on this blog so here I am. The holidays went smooth, I gained a pound. Since then I've made it to the gym several times and I am back down to 166. Lately I haven't had the desire to eat healthy at all so who knows how long I can maintain, or lose for that matter, the weight.
And here's where I stop reading. I don't buy the premise of the novel. You get ONE item from the menu: either a tortured prostitute, OR a catacomb of horrors, OR documents entailing a vicious plot to take over the U.S. government but not all three.
And how could I not give the bonus prize to A Quiet mind for bringing Buddha into the mix. I don't need that kind of bad karma on me, so I will dig into the vault and pass something along to you as well. Thanks for all the comments!
What beautiful Symmetry...
But even with this, I find myself unable to come to terms with my dilemmas on personal religious doctrine combined with the doctrine the rest of the world accepts and adores. Growing up in a church that did not value an educational and intellectual approach to religion, as well as being constantly surrounded by people who blindly follow a belief structure simply because they were raised that way has become a demonizing part of my struggles with religion, as well as believing in God in general.
4.Tribute My Ass
The Blair Witch Project (1999)
The room I worked from , used to be very hot, with the sun streaming into it all day- and I just wanted to share the super simple way I created an awning which has made it into such a lovely and cool room to work from.
Today I made a card for the Free For All challenge over at Splitcoast. The theme was to have a "character". I used this oh so sweet piglet! I had fun coloring this little cutie! The name of this digital image is Cutest Piglet Ever by Studio 313. You can find this digi at www.mcmahonfivedesign.com. The sentiment is computer generated.
In continuing with April is National Poetry Month, I’d like to introduce to William Alfred (16 August 1922 – 20 May 1999).
She is SUPER into puzzles these days. She put all 4 of these 12 piece puzzles together by herself.
The alien Slithergees are a marvellous creation, constantly heaping self-pity on the humans and using manipulation to dominate. It is hilarious how often the Slithergee leader utters the pathetic line "I am a poor, blind Slithergee." It is unusual for a Seventh Doctor story to go right-wing and attack politically-correct values. This story is clearly hitting out at lobbies that defend the rights of the disabled and ethnic minorities (not necessarily a line I would want to take, though I am a Tory). Seventh Doctor stories have tended to be far more left-liberal than this.
"Please," I said again, pen and paper ready, "I'm going to the hospital to see the family. Can you tell me your name" - she was already shaking her head - "just so I can tell them I heard it from you?" But she lit a Newport and walked away.
Also, did I mention the baby will actually look like a baby then?
I’m nervous.
Thank you for indulging me in my shoe indulgence today.
As the years went by I bought the package type of tapioca but it just didnt taste the same. I tried making it myself but constantly stirring was a pain in the you know what and then it just didnt come out the way my granny's did.
And that’s just unschooling. If you’ve also made other different and radical choices in how you live, if your views on many other things are very different from the dominant culture, it gets even worse.
North Kaibab
One party you don’t want to be when BP's bankruptcy lands square squash on the table is a Louisiana fisherman or a Florida tourist operator. British pensioners first! Sure, Obama has declared that BP is liable for all damages yada yada, but there’s a long list as we speak of Gulf Coast residents who can’t hardly squeeze a penny out of the company even now, and that’s before any serious litigation has started.
What can one say of such a stream of insanity, a string of emotional trigger words that Reality prohibits from tossing into the same bucket of hyperbole? After all, Joly is the same menopausal NordoPod who proposed to replace the traditional Fourteenth of July military parade on the Champs-Élysées with a “citizens’ march.”
UPDATE at 1 p.m. CST: How ironic is it that my boss is in a meeting all afternoon and has asked me to watch his 13 year old daughter for him? Hahahaha! (She's nice. Reminds me of my nieces. She's a good mix between the two...kinda cracking me up right now!)
So this is instead a little news post.
I like what I put together here for my friend Tamares’ wedding in Broughton Castle, Oxfordshire. Beautiful English Summer Day – July 18th 2009.
Within every lifetime, there are moments that can pretty much rock someone to the core. Even if it doesn't fully involve you, you still can get caught up in the event just as much as the true party involved. Sometimes you can see it coming but most of the time you don't. Some can handle surprises like these, but unfortunately I am not one of those kinds of people. I take mine like a sucker punch to the face. And the best example if this comes from last Thursday night when I had one hell of a bomb shell dropped on me.
Kicking the night off with a new track, “White Noise,” Mogwai followed with the sublime “Friend of the Night,” off Mr. Beast, the stage lighting inducing flashbacks of the track’s insanely popular YouTube video with that spotlight which follows a never-ending path of eerie plaster carvings. Though definitely heavy on new tunes like “Rano Pano,” “How to Be a Werewolf” and “You’re Lionel Richie,” the setlist included a few surprises, like 1997 single “New Paths to Helicon, Pt. 1″ and “Batcat” from the 2008 EP of the same name, bringing out audience favorite “Mogwai Fear Satan” from 1997′s Young Team for the final encore. Mogwai returns Stateside in September but will only hit up the east coast. Road trip, anyone?
Sunday, again nothing unusual went on. We did the same 'ol church routine. I felt slightly more tired and the soar/scratchy throat lingered but did not get worse......until Monday.
It’s not that the legislature can’t do anything about it, it is clear that they have no intention of doing anything at all. They have no desire to debate the manufactured “science” cited as the reason for necessity of the law, nor to question the mercantile motivation of the Smoking Ban sponsors. Legislators know full well that Smoking Bans are designed to drive pharmaceutical company profit by rescinding business property rights, and eliminating the venues available to adults that choose to smoke. It is government approved coercion to use the NRT products marketed by Smoking Ban sponsors while still keeping tobacco sales legal.
Even though… I can’t go to the birthday party today…T_T
OAK LEAF
In case the video is taken down by the powers of YouTube, it's basically Cutrone surrounded by her posse of models(?) calling the most recent ANTM contestant that was booted (who actually walked out on her own) a list of unfavorable adjectives. Maybe this will become a weekly thing? Perhaps the season can be saved?
How do you keep going at work when it seems as if the bottom has dropped out of your personal world? Sometimes a divorce can make even the most mundane tasks seem difficult and leading a company or running a business can seem beyond you.
Now roll into a large ball and wrap in glad wrap and place in fridge to rest for an hour.
How do you react to a bad review?
I may not be able to cover all my shots with a half-dollar like they do, but between my two plates I could account for all 36 rounds fired and that made me more than a little happy with this rifle.
Words from one of my poems is now engraved on a large glass statue outside Timespan arts centre in Helmsdale.
Generally, the people who you dislike are statistically much more likely to dislike you. This may seem obvious, but it’s funny how well it applies.
Destroying America through the 1965 Immigration Act, which he completely lied about, before it was passed and signed in to law.
Within an hour, I had a call back, with news that there was an opening at Champaign County Nursing Home, 1 mile away from her home, 3 miles away from ours. In Garden View Court, a unit set up specifically for Alzheimer's patients. This was looking good.
Blocking access to the serving counter is one of most obnoxious and selfish behaviours encountered in the pub
And it is but a child of air
IF YOU TEACH AN IDEA, EXPECT YOUR STUDENTS TO USE IT!
These affirmations are so amazingly positive for me. They buoy me and strengthen my focus. The hard thing is that while I do yoga, I am thinking of Camille almost the entire time.
be happy with yourself...
- they’re invisible, and move in mysterious ways
10. Thunder and Lightning
A further email from ‘Jim’ sums up his feelings about his deployment. It reads: ‘I’m being sent out to stabilise a country I have no faith, interest or empathy in, to prop up a government the UN says is corrupt.
Of course I had to add a print...with the tie obi that Megan made out of a couple of Ally's ties! And because I'm all matchy-matchy, I had to do blue shoes to go with the ties.
The chart shows the handful of pins needed by the Pentium III in 2000 to more than 2000 pins for the 6-processor Intel Core i7-3960x in 2011. (I think Wegener’s graph has swapped the red and blue curve colors. The red curve seems to match the bandwidth scale and the blue curve seems to match the pin count scale.)
- Adjustable natural leather strap; drop ranges from 10″ to 12″
Aw, gee. A 7… but let me explain. Gone, for the most part, are the traits that made the characters in the the first book seem like clones of those other, more sparkly, immortals. Gone is the angst and uncertainly that drove me mad about Kate in the first book. But unfortunately, gone is Vincent for a large part of Until I Die. And he is sorely missed. I clung to the moments where he and Kate were together; for in these moments, Vincent was a charmingly swoon-worthy, if not “under the weather”, immortal. I loved how their relationship was dealt with in this installment, although I still wonder why they insist of “keeping secrets” in order to “protect” each other… In addition, I love the way that Amy pulled Kate’s grandparents even further into the story and into Kate’s life. What I didn’t love was the inclusion of some new, rather predictable, new characters. The lack of Vincent and the inclusion of these new characters were what dragged the Characters score down.
tomatoes
Assistant taps into many aspects of the iPhone, according to people familiar with the feature and SDK findings. For example, one can say make appointment with Mark Gurman for 7:30 PM and Assistant will create the appointment in the user’s calendar. On noting events, Assistant also allows users to set reminders for the iOS 5 Reminders application. For example, a user could say “remind me to buy milk when I arrive at the market.” Another example would be integration with the iOS Maps application. A user could ask: “how do I get to Staples Center?” and Assistant will use the user’s current location via GPS and provide directions.
Purchased at auction from Winebid.com.
But in the late 1970s Top of the Pops began allowing limited numbers of pre-recorded music videos. This is another symptom of the larger shift in the nature of television away from the BBC’s theatrical model and towards a different model. Increasingly the video clip became recognized as an existent item. This has been manifesting across the board - in the increasing realization that junking the BBC archives was a mistake, in the shift towards a more heavily edited style for Doctor Who, and in how music is performed.
Some people describe me as an artist - a con artist.
Austin had an appointment with his nephrologist today. That’s the kidney doctor for those of you not in the know. While we don’t have any official results from his labs yet, she did say that his estimated GFR is now about 60. If you remember back to last spring when we were trying to decide whether or not to continue chemo, our dilemma was driven in large part by an abysmal GFR of 27. Anything below 30 makes a patient eligible for dialysis and a GFR below 15 indicates that it’s time for transplant.
Dr. Burke then shows Helen a security tape, showing the night she was admitted to the psych ward. When they get to the part where Candyman was floating above Helen, she can clearly see that there was nothing above her. She watches the tape in disbelief.
We got our results yesterday. Our appointment was at 1:15 but we weren’t seen until 1:45 because people are inconsiderate and run late for their appointments.
1. Never add lemon juice to the marinade, this moistens the fish and will ‘break’ it up when smoked. Add lemon juice to the fish after it has been smoked and removed from the oven and whilst it is still hot.
PS If you’re in Philadelphia, you can catch Nicky Romero Saturday, May 19th at The Roxxy.
(201) 836-3151/(201) 907-0493
This is Mr. Sunny. 10 years ago I adopted Mr. Sunny and Miss Abbey together, when I was returning from a trip to N. Carolina. He has always been such a quiet fellow that I hardly knew he was in the house. He seems to have very few social skills, always sitting a little way off watching what is happening but rarely taking part in whatever is going on.
Jesus didn’t let His disciples ‘help’ Him when the Roman soldiers came for Him. He kept them out of it, or, in a manner, left them behind; Then Abraham said to his young men, “Stay here with the donkey;
Here’s a poem I wrote when I was 20 years old. It expresses my hunger for life and excitement for what lay ahead of me. It also reveals an insatiable restlessness developed through years of being a shut-in (I can’t think of more than one close friend I’ve made in college; that’s how serious I was about getting the hell out). The title of the poem doesn’t mean I was afraid of heading forward; walking sideways means living in the moment while keeping your goals in sight.
It's a question of taking the idea that formal schooling isn't the only way, all the way. Idzie says she doesn't want a "normal" job. The jobs she aspires to are occupations that don't need school; (she's already a very successful writer and has already been invited to speak at alternative education conferences!). Her job interests include natural medicine consultant, writer/editor, vegetarian/vegan cooking/catering, teaching primitive skills... which can be learned through apprenticeships.
Don't do a blogfest because everyone else is - decide if you want to do it. Don't blog about your querying process if you don't feel comfortable making it public. Your blog is your space. Use it as you want to.
the storm. How cool is that?
Still, I’m not complaining.
*Homebrewers: For mini-kegs I have an extra CO2 bottle and hoses, if you have the proper fittings.
She also recalled the grind of playing vaudeville in her native Brooklyn. “I was doing so many shows that I was losing two pounds a day. It was a matter of life and death! There wasn’t much relaxation. You didn’t even have time to eat. When you start in the morning and work until midnight – it gets to where you don’t have any personal life. You just exist!”
Well Mr Johnson is Lichfield’s favourite son; his birthplace is a museum; there’s a plaque on the site where he was first taught English in primary school; and his statue and portrait is to be seen all over the place. What surprised me, given his propensity to come up with pithy lines, including on coffee and tea, was that there was no sign of these quotes on the walls of the tea rooms and coffee shops we visited yesterday.
Second run: 1.85
Reading into every word you say
Encounter: 4 Songhaunts, 1 Spectral Bard
The next day I met up with Nik who is a friend of a friend of a friend of a blah blah blah, who just moved to Tokyo. We decided to explore the city together. (Read: explore; wander around all night waiting for the fish market to open at 5am) At the crack of dawn we ditched the Ramen shop we were hanging out and and made the trek to Tsukiji Fish Market. Upon arrival we wasted no time ordering up a Sake and a full spread of the worlds freshest sushi. (Tip: It never hurts to make friends with the chef.) As we watched the chef carefully construct our amazing breakfast, I had to stop myself from drooling all over the bar. After what seemed like an eternity (Real Time: 8 minutes) an incredibly beautiful plate of food was placed in front of me. I expected myself to inhale this masterpiece in seconds but found myself hesitating to even pick up my chopsticks. Why you ask? The answer is this. I love sushi. I love sushi at home. It’s delicious and I eat it all the time. If I eat this magical plate of food will I be ruining sushi for me forever? Will I ever be able to eat the sushi back home again? This hesitation lasted approximately 36 seconds, when I turned to Nik and noticed the look of pure bliss on his face as he ate a piece of fatty tuna belly. Let me tell you this, NO REGRETS. We ate slowly and allowed ourselves to enjoy every last bite, sipping sake along the way. Definitely a food highlight in my life.
Also: the flavor of this salad really deepens with time, so consider making it a day (or even two) before you want to eat it.
One package that fell more under the former than the latter category was from a 'promotions' company trying to convince us that we should commission them to make us some Sell! Sell! branded pens. They even sent an example to whet our appetite. That pen is the pen you see above.
"It’s the most common question I’m asked in letters and even among inmates here, but I have never once thought of marijuana in the actual in two years," he said in a prison email. "Not missed smoking it. In fact, I’ve never thought about it once."
collecting
I thought to share with you today a sneek peek of these photoshoot days and took a few pictures myself. The pictures are of course not of equal quality as those taken by the photographers for the magazine Habitania.
§ How can a young man keep his way pure? By keeping it according to Thy word.
TEX WASABI'S KOI FISH TACOS
And finally, a new header!
You can substitute with brown Sugar.
Vest - H & M
It'll be the front door at the back of our wheeled home when we've removed the tailgate.
Brian even gave it the thumbs up which, for a man who usually
Contributor Notes / 99-100
Dark, rustic and weathered patina forever bind an intricately carved Medieval style cross of pewter to an antique medicinal bottle of frosty patinaed pale aqua glass. Traces of earthly remnants cling to the inside of the bottle, serving as a reminder of its century long hideaway within the depths of the sea. Flashy iridescence adds an element of enchantment and surprise to the weathered feel of the piece. The Bottle reads, Pisos cure - Hazeltine & Co. - For Consumption"
Alone the left side are 3 shades, along the top are first two tints, then a tone, and finally another tint (the lightest tint I could find, it's nearly white!).
Love is kind.
Did that encourage you? Yeah, me too. I'm glad I wrote it down.
This coherent and elegant presentation of iconic black and white images from six masters of light and composition is well worth a visit. Highlights of the exhibition include
I was using an Eagle Industries external medical pouch from my medic ruck for my IFAK/BOK, but it was too big and got in the way whenever I dove to the ground. I switched it out for a single-stack rifle magazine pouch instead. It holds a large Israeli Battle Dressing, a Nasopharyngeal Airway device, a chest punch needle and chest seal (needle thoracostomy, for reduction of pneumothorax issues), and a pair of nitrile gloves. It wouldn't hurt my feelings to add a package of compressed gauze, but I'm not overly concerned about lacking it either. This set-up provides me with enough gear to provide basic self-aid for most battlefield injuries that I'm likely to sustain and still be able to treat (to reiterate, since the question came up in a class/clinic recently, your IFAK/BOK is there to treat YOU. It's NOT for your buddy. If he doesn't have one, make him build one, build one for him, or improvise when the time comes to patch holes in him. DO NOT USE YOUR PERSONAL IFAK/BOK to treat ANYONE else. In addition to her personal IFAK/BOK, HH6 even had me mount on on the morale officer's diaper bag!)
Initially, I wasn't going to include Live in London in my coverage of the Judas Priest discography, because, frankly, I couldn't be bothered to track it down and add it to my collection after being underwhelmed by the very similar '98 Live Meltdown. But, thankfully I've got friends who are far more thorough and obsessive than I am over particular bands, and as it turns out, Live in London is actually a step better than its predecessor in terms of delivering a more memorable performance from the newer singer. Not so much that I would plunk my money down to find a copy, but enough that I could recommend it over Meltdown to anyone seeking out it's probably the definitive 'Ripper' Owens Priest experience without actually being there in person.
We are not reloading; we are in a rebuilding process. Our team is made up of reserves of past years and freshmen who will get the opportunity to play this year and hopefully be up to the challenge…Our baseball accomplishments measured by victories this year could be moderate. From our players we need a dedication of purpose, firm self-discipline and tenacious determination. Hard work and aggressive play must overcome our limitations.
Quirks and Adjustments... I had to lengthen the bodice in front by 1". I did this above the dart if I remember right, then I did the same for the side pattern piece at the same level. I added that 1" to the side seam in back, but tapered to nothing at the CB piece, since I normally do a swayback type adjustment. I also had to shorten the stripes by 1-1/4". I think I could have shortened them a bit more...that might have solved my back bra-showage issue.
Take short, frequent walks with your child and examine nature. Use nature books to identify and explore the nature around you—birds and growth. Measure growths of plants weekly. Your child can draw pictures of plants while watching their life cycle.
Finally, to my friends on facebook, dailymile and my co-workers……..thank you! I could not have done this without your help along with everyone in the previous paragraph. Depending on how I feel after my trip to the Philippines next February/March, I’ll more than likely be back in 2013! For now, onto the Bay To Breakers 12K in May and then…..training for the DSE Six Hour Distance Classic in early July!
33 of the ex parte decisions (about 50%) concerned Section 2(d) likelihood of confusion refusals, and the Board affirmed the PTO as to 25 of the refusals -- or about 75%.
* Stitching of some kind - machine, hand or even hand-doodled is fine
This program will import the data from my Fitbit (in general) but now that the Fitbit includes an altimeter it would be so cool to see logged activities corresponding with maps. Sigh, it lacks that feature…
Monday: Veggie Quesadillas with salsa and guacamole (Use Daiya dairy free/soy free cheese if needed. (I love quesadillas because I can personalize them for myself, my hubby and my little guy!))
What has me excited is that this tape is super strong, and comes in two economical sizes: 1/2" for larger things, and 1/4" for narrow objects.
This morning we planned to snuggle up in our big coats & take a hot flask of vegetable soup to our favourite beach. It was actually snowing when we left the house, but not settling.
Well that's all for now. My life really isn't too exciting, is it???
The translator includes this introductory note:
The funny thing is as you can imagine the kids haven’t seen each other for the summer, the parents haven’t seen each other. So there is this din of people just chatting away which means that as the school isn’t using a microphone no-one actually hears a word they are saying, unless of course you are at the front.
“Well?”
The bcurious is very good value for money. If you’re new to toys and want an high-quality, entry-level vibe that isn’t an intimidating penetrative job, the bcurious won’t disappoint. If you’ve got a range already but want to upgrade your hand held external stimulator to one that’s smarter, sexier, rechargeable and waterproof, the bcurious is definitely the way to go. So, basically, I love it. Run out and buy it. But even if you don’t, just go try that thuck thuck thuck brrrrrr against your hip bone and then imagine that between your legs. Dreams are made of this.
Now we must go back and tell the people this is the
She had so many devices
Not sure why I use it often but see it on a regular basis. Meanings: at the present time or moment, under present circumstances, to draw attention to a particular statement, used in or as a request or question, as a consequence of the fact, or (informal) fashionable.
take nips from a bright red tomato
It's like making excuses for Hitler.
QuantumPhysica
1166 **D-IV/29/1993. “T. S. Eliot’s Thomas Becket.” Barat College, Lake Forest, Illinois. (Incorporated in Item C-1993(2), above, pp. 138-49.)
This is a long overdue post, though not without reason. I got these lip tars back in August but only got to make this mixing post now because the colors are SO HARD to photograph!! I really don't understand why, I suppose the colors are too intense for my digicam? I'm no profressional photographer so I couldn't figure out why I couldn't get accurate photos of the color. At first I thought it was because of the dark/cloudy August and September weather so I was waiting for the weather to clear up so I could take photos in bright and natural lighting. Come the end of October, the weather is finally sunnier, but I still couldn't take proper photos. Anyway I decided to just post this and compensate by adjusting the colors through Photoshop, haha.
But the truth is that the food that our kids eat does have a direct effect on how they learn. That’s just the truth. So this isn’t a luxury. This isn’t a set-aside. This isn’t a sidebar. One recent study showed that kids who ate breakfast were more attentive. They had faster response times than kids who don’t. That’s learning.
For my Digi Bells DT Post today I decided to make a tag. I don't make many tags, but fancied doing something a little different and they are also a great way of using up your scraps!!!
I am happy and honoured to be here – in this place, during this year, on this day, for this occasion.
The pink raffia I found on clearance at least 3 years ago!
"Oh, WAY too difficult!! They will NEVER make it to the top."
And that concludes my little rant about my body and PCOS. Thank you :)
We waited until the afternoon to decide if we wanted to get going with the labour. Dr. Sasha came in and talked to me about what he thought was the best idea and we decided to augment my labour and meet this baby. I was scared, I just wanted her to be okay. I knew she was going to be smaller and because she was under 36 weeks she would need to be admitted to the NICU. I asked who was working in the NICU that day it was Louise. Louise was also there for us with Jackson so it was like another bonus, I knew my baby girl was going to be in good hands.
like, take-all-your-clothes-off-on-the-porch-before-you-come-in mess
For gratitude, as in many things in life, look for the small stuff. What she recommends is finding 5 things every day that you are grateful for and writing them down. You can also do this in your head, but I recommend having a gratitude journal for at least for a little while.
Wash and pat dry the green chillies, cut into small rounds and transfer to a large bowl.
The rigorous academic environment and strict uniform policy of black blazers, red ties and khakis isn't for everyone. The first senior class began with 150 students. Of those who left, many moved out of the area and some moved into neighborhoods that were too dangerous to cross to get to the school, King said. Fewer than 10 were expelled or dropped out, he said.
Perhaps the oceans depth; once the dolphin's near
I had to use these lovely HOTP papers again as I just loved the richness of the colour but it's mostly all gone now except for some scraps (sob, sob)
Sure, The Wrong Man builds an almost unbearable amount of suspense, but in a very different way from many of Hitchcock's other works. This time around, the director tells the real-life story of Manny Ballestrero, a Stork Club musician and mild-mannered family man mistakenly sent to prison for a crime he didn't commit. The majority of the powerful tension created here derives from the fact that we know Ballestrero is innocent, and are powerless to do anything but watch as he gets trapped tighter and tighter in a net of bad luck and circumstantial evidence.
That’s real good news for the folks who grow corn and soybeans and the like for a living, many of whom have struggled merely to survive the last decade or so.
Only four of eleven fights went to a decision, which is more indicative of the experience range in fighters than overall how exciting it was. I can’t get over the fact that Liz Carmouche fought a girl with only one professional fight, that should have never been put together by the promotion or accepted by the commission. This fight alone devalued most of the card for me showing the need for better match makers.
Citrinos ar žaliosios citronos skiltelė (Garnish with Lime)
For food there are burgers – lots of them, much the same as can be got in the Holyrood 9A and Bruadar. I don’t really get why people are so obsessed with eating burgers all the time, but they are good burgers. Being the first night, the staff aren't quite up to speed yet, but that will doubtless improve.
But, then I heard the first single off the new album (“Strange Clouds”), and it made me start to think even more… It was one of those songs where I didn’t hate it, but I didn’t like it either… So I was stuck midway. After hearing “So Good” I started to learn towards the album being a positive release… Let’s see if I’m right…
Words you never told me,
And then there's Polanski. The director ensures a dialogue heavy and complicated script holds together without an ounce of fat. He apparently eliminated a Gittes voiceover from the script and tightened up the famous ending: bringing everything to a head in one climactic confrontation instead of over several more complex scenes. He also placed the film's celebrated "Forget it Jake, it's Chinatown" at the very end. The line had apparently already existed elsewhere in the script but Towne could never quite make it fit - in the end its placement is perfect, capturing the tragic futility Gittes struggle in a single phrase.
Using the various social media monitoring tools we’ve discussed you can automate much of the monitoring tasks. But you need someone to follow the conversations and report on significant ones. You also need someone to follow up with your community. They’ll expect that, once you engage them.
The filming of the video is done and our concert will be held soon. I’m so excited! I can’t wait to meet our fans!!
In a heavy skillet begin to brown ground beef in 1 tablespoon oil.
Pure, unadulterated joy is such a great feeling.
recessed lighting
– a 38-foot long panelled living room with wood burning fireplace and views over Central Park.
“We’ll find another way go to hell.” said Rachel.
43Now when the meeting was ended, a number of the Jews and of the God-fearing Gentiles who had become Jews, went after Paul and Barnabas: who put before them how important it was to keep on in the grace of God.
Whenever I hear people saying things like "Unschooling obviously wouldn't work for everyone, but parents should have a right to choose what's best for their kids," or one of the hundred other variants on that same sentiment, I always feeling a niggling sense of unease. It's never a statement I've agreed with. But until recently, I wasn't entirely sure why it bothered me! I mean, there's the obvious in that I believe unschooling can work for anyone, as unschooling is really free choice in education, so a child could choose something very structured, like their parent teaching them with a curriculum or going to school. But there was something more than that bothering me, and I only realized yesterday what it was.
Hints / Tips
But yet, while all the others were granted supervision and immediately released, I was issued the order to undergo compulsory treatment and rehabilitation for two years at a Pusat Serenti! I was shocked by `the injustice’ of it all: How could this be?! How could God have granted the others their immediate freedom while I – `the most deserving’ – have to undergo more of this ordeal?!
Well, I hope you have enjoyed your stop here along the blog train. While you are here, check out some of my older posts... I have some links to digital freebies that I have made and I have some more in the works! Thanks for visiting and please come back again.
“I would think zealous repression of sexual knowledge is more of a gateway sexual activity than holding hands or kissing,” says Avonia the Wiccan Pimp. “All this is going to do is eliminate foreplay and have teens go straight for awkward, unlubricated penetration.”
In just a few short weeks, your baby brother's and baby sister should be here with us. It's hard to believe that you've been gone long enough for me & daddy to figh infertility, to become pregnant, and to bring three more little lives into this world.
And I have no problem with the cheesiness of this film. It can be cheddar for all I care, this movie appeals to the child’s audience and the child in all of us. And my inner child tells me I loved slapstick back in the day. This movie delivers it well, just like Home Alone. And apparently this did well in the box office… And in Southeast Asia… Weird.
Rule #9: While I personally enjoy my Summers off from work (now), I have also worked multiple jobs at a time just to keep up with my lifestyle. My normal work week is pretty much 24/7… I work very hard during the school year and then I enjoy my “time off” in the summers – yet I am always working. My goal is to create employment for myself where I am the master of my time – we’ll see if that comes to fruition (see Life List).
I hate PTSD. I hate that it took him. I hate that I forgot to tread lightly and look for the tell-tale signs that his mood was not matched with mine. I hate that he knows I wasn’t being a bitch but he can’t help himself and I hate that he is still intentionally hurting me with the word “whore”. I hate the war. I hate “I dunno”. I hate that he hates me but can’t live without me. I hate that he doesn’t know if he wants me to stay or go. I hate that I am settling for being hated. I hate that I don’t know if I’m even allowed to feel any of this and maybe I shouldn’t because most people actually have to live in the same space as it. I hate that I feel like a phony. And I hate that I feel useless.
Hubby: No
Good morning beloved…
Scoop the flesh out of the potatoes into a bowl. Add the vegan butter, almond milk, salt, pepper and pesto to the potatoes. Mix until well combined.
They already have thousands in their database… that are theirs to keep once they develop the right retention plan.
But not everywhere is suffering equally. We are noticing that where there is a very pleasant village-style environment – where people in their leisure time will wonder around with a coffee with their kids, popping in and out of shops, getting fantastic service, having a little chat with the staff who they know quite well – these places are prospering. This is the reality of shopping: if it’s not a pleasant experience, why would you go out and do it? You will just buy those things online.
Well apparently I'm done with the goat. :p Here is a random picture of the duck egg popcakes I made the other day. They were very yummy! This was a recipe I had written down from Emily at Wild Roots Homestead long ago and finally used.
Most artists today are switching to digital, however. It's not quite the majority, but it will be soon. They draw in photoshop with a Wacom (or other brand tablet).
03 Transmission (Live)
Having featured this lovely venue, I’d like to add what today’s secret actually is. When selecting a venue for your wedding, look past all the well-known venues that need to be booked two years in advance. Because these venues host so many weddings (sometimes up to 5 a week) – there’s a certain lack of intimacy and personalized service.
Every weekend and many weeknights there are beer dinners, festivals, tastings and sales meetings with our distributors for Dorsey and Laurin to attend. If we are double (or triple) booked, then my wife and I, or Byron and Cory would head out after brewing.
The mystery composer in love
Total time: 1 hour and 15 minutes
okay, so i owe the blog world this post. i promise that i have really not abandoned my blog in favor of facebook no matter what anyone says!!! =)
(c) Copyright Page Bryant, 2006 & 2012. All Rights Reserved.
Include my avatar.
Our experience with the Japanese during the war was also a shared experience. Both city’s were ravaged by the cruel occupation. One could find very beautiful memorials dedicated to the heroes and victims of the war around downtown. The strategical location of Manila and Singapur were ideal for just about everything, including serving as military bases for invading armies. I’m hoping to find a good book about WWII events here in Singapore.
Brylee just came into the living room and said....
wherever there is.
Anyway, as Monday's article stated, Corbet apparently did not wish to be interviewed, other than to state that his apparent attempt to find replacements was unsuccessful. Well Corbet, I take strong offense to those comments! Not sure why you decided to back out on my offer and back out on the entire CB community, but I am not going to sit back here and look like a fool. You are clearly the one who has failed and who has let everyone down! Unlike you, apparently, I have great relations with my City's Mayor, Deputy Mayor, and various councillors; and unlike you, apparently, I had the dignity and respect for my city's community to step aside when I could no longer do my job for St. john's Pride to the best of my ability, and I took steps to put a transparent, accountable and democratic process in place to fill my seat and fill two other new seats.
Beyond Macaroni and Cheese by Mary Beth Lagerborg (of Once-a-Month-Cooking fame) and Karen Parks, offers Moms many practical, husband-and-child-friendly, easy-on-Mom recipes. Though the recipes are not low-fat, low-calorie or low-carb, it is because they aren’t meant to be. This isn’t a healthy eating cookbook by any definition (though many of its recipes can easily be adapted to be healthier); instead, it does what it set out to do: offer up many, easy-to-do “Mom Approved, Kid Tested” recipes.
As the now middle aged man, and defiant teenage daughter went head to head.......
Intrepid readers, you should be so proud. I pasted an enchanting smile on my face and said, "Thank you for your time." and walked away.
white-hating, America-loathing preacher who for decades served as
Cabin Fever 2 is a hard film to judge as all compromised movies are. In any case it is markly smoother than either of West’s previous films and features some of the same flashes of natural talent that the others do. However the good moments aren’t the only ones that bear West’s fingerprints and ultimately the question of how many of the film’s problems were the cause
all the cuteness that surrounds me on a daily basis.
Many thanks to organiser, Marc Holmes and the Campaign for Real Ale for putting on a fantastic festival that exceeded every one of my expectations.
Baby Girl needs a name, a place to put her things, but first I must wash myself and her brother, send him to his father's house, hire a doula and pick up her diapering accoutrements.
I mumble something aloud which is supposed to alert you to this fact, but if it's words, I don't know what language they're in. I think maybe I'll bite down on your shoulder, bury my face in your chest.
That was it. We called the Bettles air from my finely working Iridium satellite phone to pick us up, packed, and were ready to go. We should return to this van – our only link to civilization in 12 days or so. That is assuming the weather cooperates. So far it was raining, all the time, just a bit harder or softer. The thinking was that pilots don’t fly late in the day (after 5PM) so we may end up camping on this lake (not so bad, there was a parking lot and a toilet not far from our van). But suddenly they decided that the weather was fine to fly (cloud level wasn’t very low so that they can see the mountains) and it wasn’t so late and sent two planes at the same time.
Read, Write, Read… it’s easy as pie.
Your assignment, if you choose to accept it, is to "Invite a Blogger to Your Table"! This is a fun event and an outlet for us each to challenge ourselves and create stronger bonds within the blogging community. Nothing is more intimate, or more effective at creating friendships than cooking and sharing meals together, even it is virtually. But hey, if you live in the same area as another blogger what's to stop you from gathering in your own kitchen for this challenge.
Also a few members have been having problems leaving comments so please bear with us and hopefully this will be sorted with Mr Blogger very soon.
8 seemed
Death is no different whined at than withstood.
And I sleep the sleep of the just. I devour the sensation. My brain works out my problems while my body comfortably rests and restores in a sweet-smelling bed, in a sunlit room. Two hours. In the end I dream of a beautiful, white room, walled with clear, sun-streaming windows, a sparkling, wide-stretching wood floor, smooth and perfectly clean. Empty of furniture. It is an image of my mind. Stillness, loveliness, order replace confusion. Serenity. Relief.
The take away message from this post is that there are already enough road blocks to desired behavior. You can remove some of those roadblocks by giving your audience an easy way to find you on social media, even in traditional advertising.
Let’s see. Let’s take the reviewer known as ‘kehs’ from Hertfordshire, England. They gave Living with the Truth a 5-star review. On checking I find that they have, at the time of my writing this, posted 517 reviews and here are some of their ratings:
If the licensee fails to make a payment when due, the licence agreement generally provides for interest payments, at a specified rate and in the agreed-on currency. In domestic agreements, a rate of 3-5 percent above a recognized banking rate in that country is customary. For international agreements, the parties negotiate to select the international bank to be used for the base rate, subject to the applicable government rules in the licensee’s country.
The post-World War II California economy was dominated by large private companies in aerospace, heavy manufacturing, finance, insurance, telecommunications, and rapidly expanding public sector entities—the U.S. Postal Service, the state employment/unemployment offices, the local governments, and school systems. Once hired into these private or public entities, in the absence of misconduct, a worker could expect long-term employment.
13. The Night Porter
I did it! I completed the A-Z blog challenge. It felt like a marathon, but I'm proud of myself for doing it. I'll be blogging M-W-F from now on. Let me know if you miss me during T-Th-Sa. :)
Personal Scooters are also very popular in stores, such as Wal-Fuck, who provide them for their "disabled" customers to use while shopping. It is quite amusing to see the fat, wheezing white trash customers fight to get one on a Saturday, as there are usually only 2 Personal Scooters per store.
Creamy Lemon Salad Dressing
Stay creative...have fun....enjoy your art...your life.... and continue to be inspired and creative
and just wear it in a pony tail or braids while on vacation. If you do it this way, you may be able to cut down on
This Thursday, April 26, come to Comics Underground and kick this weekend off right. Mike Allred, Jen Van Meter, and more will be performing at the Jack London Bar. These nights are always a blast, and I can't see why this one would be any different.
Elegant and astonishing, Patrick Somerville tells the story of one man's journey into the heart of marriage, parenthood, and what it means to be a family. Confirming the arrival of an exuberantly talented new writer, THE CRADLE is an uniquely imaginative debut novel that radiates with wisdom and wonder.
On a highway in the night.”
KUALA LUMPUR: Former premier Dr Mahathir Mohamad feels that the Malays should be reminded of the May 13, 1969 racial riots so that a similar episode does not recur.
He’s funny. And handsome. Sweet man has little patience and mega confidence.
Over Christmas break, Cathy and I were able to sneak away to the Winking Lizard and grab a beer in between last minute shopping, eating, and family time. I was able to finally get a chance to drink the Winter seasonal from Dogfish Head, Chicory Stout.
Carl is cool.
The series continued into the 1980s, but with the advent of new styles of animation, the Super Friends faded from Saturday mornings to go after prime time and the big screen.
Well we finally have the time to close out our blog. The internet wasn't working the last two nights in Almaty so we never got to update anything. Then getting home with two boys that didn't speak English gave us no time for anything. We finally have a moment for a breather and want to close out our blog. Here's a recap of the final days and an update on how we are doing.
What do you think?? Now, don't forget that you have to copy and paste the linky thing at the bottom of your Technique Challenge project. It is very easy. Just go to the Blockheads web page Tutorial and copy the HTML and paste it onto the bottom of your post. There are prizes and lots of fun. If you are a big Facebook person, you can enter on the Blockheads' Facebook page too. There is an additional prize over on Facebook. So have fun and let's see your creation!!
My mom is basically the same. The good thing is there is nothing medically wrong with her, other then her confusion at times.
Marlene: Leaving aside reading other writers, are there things that inspire you?
So stay with me, because we're throwing off the bowlines, sailing away from the safe harbor, catching the wind in our sails, and venturing off to explore, dream and discover the Truth.
Maybe Amanda will have another surprise for me!
Reed & Barton manufactures crystal patterns that are similar to more expensive brands. Their Richmond pattern retails for approximately $27.50 a stem, so all four pieces, wine glass, wine goblet, iced beverage, and champagne flute would cost around $120.00 dollars. When compared to the cost of some of the Waterford patterns, the Reed & Barton option gives you two pieces for the price of one Waterford.
When comparing blogs, a main difference I see is posting length. Some of the bloggers create quite lengthy posts, namely In the Library with the Lead Pipe. This blog contains essay-length posts that are well-written and well-researched with proper citations. In the case of such lengthy posts, I can recognize the value of thoroughly exploring a subject. I found, however, that I never made it to the end of a post, no matter how interesting the subject was, because I was constantly interrupted. If I were to continue to follow this blog, I would have to make sure that I dedicated a interruption-free time slot to read it.
And, retro-chic that’s classy as opposed to the shoddy stab at the same genre by the designers of Team Sky’s dreadful 2010 outfit which, incidentally, hung alongside the Rapha jersey on the same clothing rail.
Joe leads Van to Dr. Alex Brandt, a rugged vet with floppy blond hair and winning smile. But just as things are starting to heat up, the newlyweds return from their honeymoon, forcing Van to decide just how much she’s willing to sacrifice in order to have everything she ever wanted. Warm and witty, poignant and funny, Stay marks the arrival of an irresistible new voice.
Accusing someone of adultery was a very tricky thing because catching someone in the act of adultery was almost impossible. One person perhaps could follow the wayward couple and hide in order to witness a very private and intimate act, but two or three persons? Very unlikely. Those were days without smart phones or digital cameras. What you saw you saw with your eyes and you told with your mouth and people could either believe you or not. You really didn’t have much more than your word.
My argument is that sometimes this view was wrong. Just because the polytheistic culture in which they lived saw gods as violent brutes who waged war on humanity did not mean Yahweh ordered the slaughter of all men, women and children in the cities he wanted Israel to conquer. Just because the political class of Jerusalem wanted all citizens to centralize their worship, and therefore their commerce and taxes, within the city did not mean Yahweh was inaccessible outside its walls. Just because the monarchy was unable to stop the Assyrians and Babylonians from overrunning Samaria and Jerusalem did not mean Yahweh had failed, and it did not require the creation of a sin-judgment motif from which to explain their suffering.
As members of Amnesty International Geneva,Switzerland, we are dismayed by the detainment of the Tamil Naduu nuclear plant protesters, the charges of sedition, conspiracy and rioting lodged against many of them, and by the prospect that some of these protesters continue to remain in jail.
E. discovery of gold in California. 418
The Boers of the republics were once in the majority as there were only small numbers of established groups in the far north east & west.
Indeed. You mentioned this idea of playscapes. How do you see this idea in relation to our consumption society? Is it a kind of liberation from the money economy, or are new ideas destined to become valuable marketable goods?
May 30th, Vancouver, BC Taught by Sherrie Siemens
Regardless, I am still recommending this one, though perhaps not as strongly as I have recommended others in the past. I thought it was a great way to pass the time without getting bogged down in boring details or getting depressed like I have with some books. Let me know if you feel the same after you read it.
An infusion of the leaf, stems, and flowers will speed the healing of rashes, hemorrhoids, and skin ulcers. Dried and powdered yarrow sprinkled on cuts and abrasions may also facilitate healing. Native Americans used yarrow in poultice form to treat skin problems. Infusions of yarrow have been used as a hair rinse in attempts to prevent baldness.
P.S. You can now sign up for email notifications when I post a new entry. Look at the upper right hand side of the page, just above my profile and followers list.
I'm off to have a little tidy up and then I might do a spot of colouring. Before I go, I made top 3 at Pollycraft - water, water everywhere challenge. Thank You again to the lovely DT, I'm chuffed to bits.
fueled by alcohol and hormones,
Obviously, it's of utmost important that I look picture perfect on this trip, for...well, pictures. Duh.
Grandma, what’s wrong?
Not to put too fine a point on it. The book selling market in the UK is between a rock and a hard place. Booksellers in trouble. Publishers selling half the books sold at high discount levels, etc. Consequently, UK publishers aren't buying that much. As of late, it's one of the hardest territories to sell into unless a title sold for a lot of moolah in the US.
I tried to watch two points at once, the counter top where the towel had been and the floor where the towel was now. Neither revealed a crawly creature. I even quickly eyeballed the air freshener to see if it was giving refuge to the enemy. Nothing there either, so I knew that he must still be lurking in the folds of the towel.
-bunch of parsley
Bear is giving me the stare down so I have got to get this great day started,be safe on the roads,share good things to whom you may met today,it may just make their day.
Fire the glass to slump and fire polish. Include an annealing ramp when firing. Again, the firing schedule (and the annealing time) will vary. Watch the glass to see when the pieces slump. We annealed the glass for over an hour. Allow the glass to cool to room temperature before removing the glass from the glass fusing kiln.
The more we can begin to appreciate and account for (a) the fact that a person’s bad (Top Real Estate in Rockford Illinois) behavior in one moment does not necessarily warrant writing them off as a numbskull, and (b) the actual situational factors at play that might be influencing decisions and behaviors, the more effective we can be at shaping those factors and, to be frank, getting what we want.
When I asked Beverly for her love advice for Simply Solo readers, she said you have to work on yourself first. “What I’ve found is that healthy people attract healthy people. I have been in therapy for many years and attracted a few unhealthy people in my life. It was because I had unresolved patterns and issues in my life that I blamed on the world. There are plenty of great guys out there that want to have a monogamous, loving relationship. It’s just that you have to make yourself healthy so you can attract that person.”
People everywhere are looking for dividing lines. A place to stake our claim and to say we are on one side of an issue or another (which in and of itself isn't always bad)...Looking for a way to throw a wall up between ourselves and others...Trying to cause division instead of love.Judging each other instead of loving.
This is the first day we've had enough snow around here for hubs to actually have to go out. Maybe just 2-3 inches, so nothing too bad, which is nice. We had SO much snow last year and it was always the horrible, deep, heavy kind. I really hope we don't get too much of that this year. But, just in case, the hubs took out a potential new employee to see if she has what it takes...
I giggle that Preston is at that "cool" age where he can't be seen where pig hats anymore... we don't let him get away with it though!
Notes: I beg everyone to be patient with the manga. It would have been much more intense if you read it when it was serializing, however, I guarantee you, this manga has many unexpected turns.
Too bad he didn't like the bars more because it would have been a healthier alternative.
Here's the sign for the pediatric orthodontist-- Mr. Alligator with his rows of teeth:
Join us and have fun and show me some LOVE!!!
I have to ask too...who made that gorgeous blanket in the background of the first video?
But alas, it was not. The real Magic Spell is the slightly lighter/greyer shade on the right. It didn't take long, however, and pretty soon I was ready to paint the bottom.
I'm afraid I've only managed to draw complete blanks about The Zippers, who would seem to be an all-female group from America with definite soul leanings. This was their only British single, but what a single it is - "My Sailor Boy" on the A-side is raw, ragged but decidedly Pop, and fizzes with energy and enthusiasm. With some records, false bonhomie creeps through the sterility of the slick production and multiple takes and ruins the potential energy of a track, but this genuinely sounds like unsuppressed gusto.
Synopsis: Light Yagami is an ace student with great prospects–and he’s bored out of his mind. But all that changes when he finds the Death Note, a notebook dropped by a rogue Shinigami death god. Any human whose name is written in the notebook dies, and now Light has vowed to use the power of the Death Note to rid the world of evil. But when criminals begin dropping dead, the authorities send the legendary detective L to track down the killer. With L hot on his heels, will Light lose sight of his noble goal . . .?
As The Low Anthem sing, “I’ve got the cure for the shape that you’re in,” I couldn’t help but think back to moments in my life where I’ve been on my way back to New York, typically by train, and met at the grandeur lacking Penn Station, typically by the girl in my life. And as much as I love to travel and as much I enjoy riding the rails, at the end of a trip, there is nothing better than stepping off the train, ascending the stairs, passing folks who are just beginning their voyages and finding the cure for being on the road and away from home.
I was very impressed with all the testing and the three people who checked me out. First I had the usual blood draw etc. Then a PA came in to ask questions and examined me. The more we talked we realized that we had known each other many years ago when she lived in Brockport. I know some of her family members and she knows our daughters, graduated the year before Steph. Small world. Finally, a nurse came in and gave me the scoop on what I need to do before I get to the hospital (and what I should bring...as in shorts and t-shirts). All were very professional and reassuring.
Professor James Chin, a political analyst with Monash University, believes that “BN has lost the public relations war”.
Emma hadn’t slept in three days. Every time she closed her eyes, she saw the river again. Saw her again.
I read very little last year. I don't know why. Perhaps the addition of a screaming insomniac baby didn't help or maybe I wasted too much time blogging, but this year I will devote more time to reading and less to drinking wine and surfing the internet. I will never achieve Dovegreyreader's ability to read nine Dickens novels in one day whilst quilting and healing the sick at the same time, neither will I manage Scott Pack's 137 books in one year. I am a slow reader. But if I can manage a book every week or so, it will be an improvement on the pitiful handful that I read in 2006.
In my mind, we were working towards developing a service which would initially have been similar to what was produced not long afterwards in Ireland – the Irish Research eLibrary (IReL) – i.e. common and deep access to electronic resources from multiple sources including numerous bibliographic databases and other catalogues. This could then have developed further into, essentially, a ‘Summon for all’ type service for UK higher and further education institutions. i.e. instead of individual institutions spending £20k or £30k each per year (or whatever the figure is) on individual commercial web-scale discovery services, this could have been achieved nationally, with subject-based flavours.
Have a blessed Valentine’s Day,
Then I remembered an old trick unwed mothers used to use: they'd fake being married with a wedding band. I figured it might work on some of the guys, not all of them probably, but some of them. It might be like a bulb of garlic to vampires... well, to some vampires. Those middle aged couples I've seen hooking up: I'm pretty sure all parties involved were married, just not to each other.
Will you quit kicking me under the table?
Pube Nazi: LOL. I can't eat that much.
Not to be. James kicked off by reminiscing about the last time he was at The Courthouse and had to endure the double pain of being sat next to Shandy for the night AND having to drive an hour home and therefore unable to savour the joys of our extensive beer list. Tonight he was able to sip plenty of Samuel Smith’s Old Brewery Pale Ale with his beer battered fish supper & mushy peas.
Supergroup my ass. That term generally signifies bland half-baked jams (Superheavy, Them Crooked Vultures), main group throwaways (Golden Smog, Monsters of Folk), intriguing novelty (The Baseball Project, Tinted Windows) or sheer wretchedness (Chickenfoot). Middle Brother brings their A game and top flight songs.
I had literally just started thinking about what project we'd tackle when I walked outside and much to my surprise John and Reed had come up with an idea and nearly had it completed to boot! I didn't even know John knew about the project.
I still have a load of cassette tapes floating around (maybe 150 or so)... mainly obscure stuff that has not been released on CD or live bootlegs of shows...
The trilogy deals with three dominant aspects of the contemporary human condition, three aspects that are all well past their prime. They will be replaced by something else, the questions are: by what, when, and how. The answers proposed are not predictions, (I believe in free-will) they are proposals.
Our little girlie turned 16 in July! That morning we drove in to the DMV so she could take her road test and get her driver's license. After an initial setback: they wouldn't let her finish the test once it was discovered that my emergency break didn't work-WHO KNEW?!?-luckily another woman offered to let Dylan use her car. We sat on standby for 2 hours. Poor kid SO wanted to get that license on her birthday! We watched kid after kid come in from their tests in tears-the Anchorage testers are known for being VERY tough! She did great, though! Came back all smiles!
and I can now say that I know 'inglourious basterds' by heart.
I pulled an all-nighter just to watch this in one sitting.
give me something real.
As with other titles illustrated by Bruce Whatley close inspection of the pictures will provide many visual jokes as well.
To honor her, I tried my hand at making authentic Polish pierogies based on the recipe that she shared with me. Although not difficult, it was a labor of love. If you are not familiar with perogies it is a dumpling that can be filled with potatoes, meat or vegetables, that is then sauteed after being boiled. Periogies are a traditional food that are enjoyed in Eastern Europe and Russia.
Long story short, just don’t ever stop writing, be careful not to burn yourself out (I think that is what I may have done with NaNo), but don’t let yourself just stop either. It’s painful to come back to it, even though I love it, even though I keep trying…
Jonathan Denbury's soul is trapped in the gilded painting by dark magic while his possessed body commits unspeakable crimes in the city slums. He must lure Natalie into the painting, for only together can they reverse the curse and free his damaged soul.
And if you want this to be a monthly thing, please please go click up my links again:
They are also a reminder that bullshit is not good for business.
Favorite non-alcoholic drink: Diet cherry soda (It's really abut all I drink aside from water.)
Embarrasment that is, Birth’n Babies, Quittin’ Jobs.
I’m not physically disfigured but my soul is. Souls don’t matter in my fragile frame of mind.
With a deep breath
GS: "Oh...... well...... nice weather today, isn't it?"
Which powder foundations have you tried and loved?
“Well is known that ambition can creep as well as soar.” (Edmund Burke)
Ha! No, but that sounds like a lot of fun! We could put each other’s hair in side buns and talk about the dreamiest Captains and have Tribble fights!
Sadly, I will be removing the Google Friend’s Connect widget from my blog next week. I’d love however if you’d continue to follow along and have several ways to do so. My blog posts are distributed on Facebook, Twitter, Bloglovin, Feedburner and via email:
This is the laws that govern a person that does not know Jesus as their Savior.
To combine their strengths into a synergy
And began eating.
“I’m getting married,” she says. “God willing!”
Rating: 4 out of 5 boxes
I arrived in California on Friday, getting picked up by a most wonderful friend of my mother’s, Kathy. She and her husband were super awesome and took me for Chinese dinner, then a mini Game of Thrones marathon before dropping me off at kick off the next morning.
Kevin, the perpetual thorn in the side of your depends, had rustled up the chairmen something fierce, something to the point of making the poor man do a mix between a mister bojangles of rage and a Jack the pumpkin king impression, and Jack’s on fire. Thought his little head was going to wobble right off I did.
6 Write interesting Descriptions
Gary Rattigan: Things Go Wrong Quite Often
I added a lot of "shine" to this light bulb - in the way of Smooch and rays of light!
I also said goodbye to everyone at the branch,
I don’t mind contributing that two per cent. I see it as my national obligation. But you refuse to pay up when you graduate from school someday in the future, and the PTPTN cannot just close shop this way. So, we taxpayers are once again come under the axe.
As for crocheting , i am making a lovely blue blanket , i will up load photos later in the week , when it should be finished .
They have room for a very large dining table that will seat 10 and have 8 existing chairs in a woven seagrass. I would like my friends to choose 2 new dining chairs for either end of the table that will be real statement pieces so I have a collection of images to provoke ideas for them and getting them to think a little outside the square.
Turn pan heat to medium and add the garlic
